hashtag #HuaweiMediapad & answer: What is Huawei India's 2-word tagline? Win this:   On why he didnt do it earlier? Coz he'd hv lost his job. This is india and u know it. So stop chiding him for it. At least he said it now.  GQ Interview:  
To win a new cool Mediapad7, just hashtag #HuaweiMediapad & answer: What is Huawei India's 2-word tagline? Win this:   Defence is a huge govt spend. Questioning it is considered unpatriotic. But shouldn't it be audited if politicians control it?  Technically speaking, can men giggle? Or is it only something women could do? 
Anyway, just launched Huawei's Mediapad7, a 7inch tablet at in Phoenix Mumbai. Also, will be giving out one to my followers!  Revealing bribery offers doesnt tarnish the chief's office. It strengthens it. Who wants a fake image anyway.  I should outgrow firecrackers. Someday. 
The ease with which we in India compromise on people's liberty in the name of religion, culture or tradition baffles me.  Salute the Army Chief for revealing the bribery allegations. Finally a chief that's serving the nation and not the netas.  so cynics like u can comment and doubt me more. No thanks. No interest. 
Gadkari is excess baggage. BJP knows it. RSS knows it. Just dawdling over it hoping it offloads itself.  pl send an email to anubha[at]  Hope everyone is having a nice diwali! 
If you keep indulging religious fanatics in the name of secularism, stuff like Haji Ali ban on women will only rise.  thank u dear!  not interested buddy. It is a quote from patanjali. But u can think whatever u want. 
Bold and admirable of Mahesh Jethmalani to resign over Gadkari. Personal conviction like this is what is needed in politics.  If you don't feel it, don't do it.  May you live like the lotus, at home, in the muddy waters. 
theres no tripID as agent called me, i paid, and no tix. pl mail me at events(at) for no  Speaking at the 'Build your city' conference tomo in Chennai. Come if you can. more about the initiative here:   Fight a battle within you. Kill the negative and evil. Bring out the positive and good. Happy Diwali! 
Hi guys! Launching Huawei tablet MediaPad7 tomo (costs Rs13.7k) in Mumbai, Croma Phoenix Mills at 11am. Come if u can.   when i drove mine on the Mumbai - Pune expressway..amazing!  i think u r wrong. completely wrong. i don't know about what tho. #outrage #callpeoplerakhisawant #trolldayandnight 
pl contact me ASAP. not getting thru, abt a big refund  Hi All! "The new Indian politician,", my column in TOI today:   kya baat hai. Kya look hai. 
"We the Shameless", my TOI col today:   absolutely not. it will bring out the best.  Sonia Shenoy of CNBC had a massive fan club in the bank. Indian TV's best kept secret. Finance brains + beauty = lethal 
Have a session at 12:00noon at NCPA tomo. Come. Will tell you what I really feel about certain authors. Kidding. Come anyway.  People told me given the 3mistakes subject, you may have issues shooting in Gujarat. None of that. In fact, excellent co-operation.  Sonia Shenoy, stunning in a Diwali special dress on CNBC. Can imagine bank trading floors gasping right now. 
thanks!  UTV told me Guj Govt is being very helpful and supportive for the upcoming shoot of 3mistakes movie. Thank You!  One dirty F-1 toilet, and you can totally imagine Kalmadi jumping - see, see..it wasn't just me. 
Gm all! 'We the shameless,' my col on TOI today:   Dinesh T on timesnow states didi knew about fare hike. What's happening then? confused.  'Let's race cars at 300km/h in Noida.' Whoever said it the first time, you have to admire their guts. 
Hi guys, am participating in this Sunday, 4th Nov 12:00 noon at Little Theatre, NCPA. Do come! Schedule:   Why doesn't Mamta di make train travel absolutely free? Why make people pay even what they do. Who cares about the finances anyway.  OPEN magazine interview, on books:  
Reading some lovely travel entries here. Makes me want to travel. What's your favorite of these submissions?:   Never make women feel uncomfortable. Don't stare, leer, invade personal space, talk cheap. It's not cool. Just smile.  Raja to Kalmadi in Jail: Get some diyas na. Kalmadi: no, you get them, you made more money. 
Guys, the Air France travel diary contest entries are in. See if you enjoy reading these entries,and vote for ur favs:   I wish we'd treat our women better. What else is there in life, really?  So are the high-profile inmates of Tihar going to do a Laxmi puja on Diwali tommorrow? 
Eid Mubarak!  Don't be serious, be sincere.  read the article sonia. pl understand the context. 
have tweeted. the party shd get rid of him him..padh lo zara meri jaan phir bola karo  Congrats Team India!!!!!  NRIs, Good Morning! This one is for you. "Why I am still here":  
Many writers upgrade,get agents in London. I want to reach masses. The day I reach Indian farmers I'll consider myself a true Indian writer.  no am not!  As promised, my response to the NYT article abt an NRI who returned (and left again):  
Will be adapting Kick from original Telugu superhit, with fair amount of changes as well. Huge expectations, need all ur support! Thanks!  Don't need to :) RT I thought Rushdie was slighting your work y'day. Why didn't u hit back n cut him to size?  Some foreign media houses love to carry 'poor little pathetic India' stories.why?Did an Indian break the editor's heart? 
Have known both Salman and Sajid Nadiadwala for a while and been wanting to work with them.Couldn't have asked for a better screenplay debut  Somebody LOVES to take unprovoked digs at me. Thank you for being part of my PR strategy.  So this NRI returned to India, and went back, and then wrote in NYT why. may just respond to him:  
Kick is a about a guy who lives life only for his kicks, a powerful concept and a perfect recipe for a Salman-Nadiadwala blockbuster  All baba fans chill. We had a good laugh before and after the session and he called later too. We wanted a fun face off format and that's it  Front page lead TOI on how Rahul G wanted net worth disclosures to include family. Wow. what would we do without him! 
Happy to share with you that I'll be writing the screenplay of 'Kick' starring Salman Khan and directed by Sajid Nadiadwala  For what it is worth, got calls from baba's office inviting me to give him suitable advice. Bitter truth hurts but ppl value it.  People find it hard to believe in themselves, forget about them believing in you. Only your faith in you matters. 
Announcement. Sort of. Tomorrow.  Sometimes you have to say the right thing even if it is against popular opinion. Sets apart the strong from the weak.  v nice thanks! 
honestly, it is is about the people.not the parties. and i am saddened abt smart ppl jumping to conclusions and forming clubs  What a day. Baba in the morning, s rushdie in the evening! Gnite!    Bought 12 tickets for entire clan to see Ra.One first day first show on Wed. The collections have begun. 
btw if i was saffron man, wudnt be writing anything abt gadkari no? thoda socha karo.  So met all is well.  but i am not a media person. i dont need to be aligned. have a good life as it is. 
i write what i think is fair. ur aspersions wont work.  thanks. My pleasure!  It is not my intention to favor/discredit any political party/person in my columns. Hope it is obvious today:  
have u checked my past, gazillion tweets on vadra before u make ridiculous statements like this? or read my col on vadra?  Even tho i'v been made fun of by one Sir, am joining the conclave from which many have backed out coz of Sir. Coz backing out is no solution  here u go angel shreya! 
Looking tough for Gadkari. Hope party acts quickly and not drag it like Yeddyurappa.  Heading to #itconclave for a session with Baba Ramdev at 11. Watch live here:   "Anna-effect on elections," my column in TOI today:  
Last week! Air France ‘Diary of a Traveler’ contest. Pen down a short para about ur fav trip and win 2 tickets worldwid   Now we know why India helped make Bangladesh.  happy birthday dearest! 
read my past tweets, and columns for the last 3 years, and then talk please. spine isn't an issue. ur lack of awareness is.  100 * 100 = 1.2bn sleep in peace. Congrats to sachin!  :) thank u 
I think Nitin Gadkari's driver should be allowed a wildcard entry into the F1 race this weekend. Gadkari ji will have to get off, of course.  Had written this about Baba earlier. So am looking forward to my session tomo. Maybe get some cures ;) :   Good Morning Everyone! Had your tea? 
Gadkari should be investigated. He should also be frisked at airports. Mr Vadra, of course, is different.  Entire #ITConclave is being streamed live here:   thank u! 
Gadkari should come clean on the allegations. And stay away from sugar. Sorry, sugar businesses.  Doing a session tomo at #ITConclave with Baba Ramdev at 11am on spirituality and politics. Yes, much fun shall be had.  thank u akash! 
Check out Huawei tab, with stunning IPS screen, 1.2 GHz & voice calling. Pre-book Rs 13700 & get a free case   It is a great conclave and I admire organizers sticking to their convictions. I like solutions and running away from conferences is not one.  thank u! 
Have always wondered, why do we Indians have a slave mentality. Anybody powerful, rich or white enters the room, why do we feel meek?  Many politicians are backing out of the #ITConclave, we all know why. The organizers requested me to step in for a session. Am doing so.  thank u! 
In a true free market, the banks would be controlling KF by now. But SBI uncles probably will still stand up if promoters enter the room.  Thanks  thank u so much! 
Our country and media are silly enough that if KF owners just pay salaries due, other monstrous sins will be pardoned. So just do it.  'Writers and films', my speech at Ficci Frames :   Heading to Jaipur. Talk this evening. Rabindra Rangmanch, 630pm. Free passes at Dainik Bhaskar office (collect by 3pm). 
Here's my guess for what regular unsecured lenders will recover for every 1Rs invested in KFA, if they r lucky: 2 paise.  Since many of our politicians are old, they only care about the short term. They want power now. Even if it hurts India long term.  Blessings for me, from a critic. Doesn't happen v often:  
thanks!  These people who make terrible decisions for the country just to stay in power for a few years, wonder what their upbringing may be. Sick.  Hello people. 
KF promoters can save face. Pay salaries from their own pocket (100-200cr max). Come out as heroes (despite sinking 10,000cr for banks)  :)  thanks! 
:)  Leadership is about new ideas, taking responsibility and doing the right thing. Not counting money, votes or power at every instant.  thanks! 
correct. Shadiness began there.  Heading to FICCI Frames, the entertainment industry conference for a session keynote address. Will post speech soon.  thanks! 
true. Stupid banks. Mayb they didnt want to miss the kf parties.  Pm office praised budget. We all know fares cant be frozen indefinitely. Still didi asking PM to fire him?  thank u neeta! 
there r not many assets. Sadly.  Someone made a good railway budget and he was fired. Not good for country. Eventually, not good for didi too. People find out, eventually.  it is avl on kindle! 
there may not b guarantees. Or even personal ones. Banks were stupid. Or influenced. Thats all.  Didi keeping indian politics fun. After all, kolkata was the capital once.  Watch me on the v cheeky and fun 'On the couch with Koel' (@koelscouch) today 730pm. Those who missed, repeats tomo Sun, 1230pm. 
KF reminds me of banking days. Yes was in bankruptcy dept. Hence the jargon. ;)  I guess there was something soul sapping about I-banking that I became a writer. Was at GS from 1998-2004. Had a great time overall.  due to unavoidable reasons, NY tweetup not possible today. apologies. will try to reschedule another time. 
worked in bankruptcy dept for 5years.  I guess there was something soul sapping about I-banking that I became a writer. Was at GS from 1998-2004. Had a great time overall.  Funny how no one has accused me of bringing Blackberry down just so that people could read Revolution 2020. 
yes. V tough situation for employees. Sad :(  "Why I left Goldman Sachs", going viral. I-banking is greed driven, but when i left GS in 2004, things weren't as bad.   india capital mgmt llc 
Banks are scared of bankruptcy as that means they have to writeoff loans at big loss. Use that stick to get employee salaries.  Just so it is clear, women are citizens and human beings who have the right to be safe whenever and whereever they are.  Those in NYC: let's do a tweetup Saturday Oct 15, at noon. Central Park, the pond near 5av/59th street. C ya! 
Funny KF employees kept working 7 months without pay, unaware where their claims will rank.  After a rape incident, women banned to work post 8pm. If there is another daytime incident, what'll they do? Tell women to stop working?  Q a frank,fun interview with the really cool Faridoon S:  
Stupid KF lenders could/should hv pulled plug years ago. Employees should engage lawyers and threaten bankruptcy if they want to get paid.  by the way, shooting for the 3mistakes of my life film goes on the floors in ahmedabad next month. Will tweet more soon..until then shhh...  u r welcome! 
Kingfisher employees should be careful accepting any deal. Co has no money. Ask for super senior creditor status above all lenders.  March 14 today, or pi day, 3.14! Govind's birthday in '3mistakes of my life'. when vidya takes him to the terrace and well, wishes him.  Ipad and Android users, can download Kindle app and then view it from there. Revolution 2020 on Kindle:  
absolutely!  :)  Revolution 2020, now on kindle :  
I guarantee you, these so called anti-dating, anti-sex Indian culture protectors think about sex way more than anyone else.  #typicalindiansounds "..........................." [tweet from the PM's office]  Heading to New York tonight for a week. Time to take a break. 
If girls didn't have mobiles, they'd borrow it from guys. Thus, hooking up will increase. Suggest we neuter Indians at birth.  #typicalIndiansounds Hain?  I promised you guys free phones. So here's the "Why wait India" contest. You have to submit a pic:  
So this MP says don't give mobiles to girls. Well, if girls won't have mobiles, might as well take away mine. Don't have anyone to call.  for every 1 person who drinks a sugar-chemical-filled drink, 10,000 others drink a glass of pure water. sunshine wali aasha..  her age just makes it more awkward for me. That's all.. 
Gm all! My fol in TOI today, on Vadra and more:   I get my share of WTFness, but what on earth is this? :   Elderly lady at AIR asks me in interview "aap sharirik sambandhon ko kaafi khul ke dikhate hain. Aakhir kyon?" What do I say? 
thanks rahul!!!  will pass on the message to the makers. baaki unki marzi :)  Har dil azeez angrezi upanyas lekhak...wow, air intro 
Write a paragraph on a memorable trip. Win 2 tickets, anywhere in the world. Or read people's entries. Take part here:   Vidya Balan is doing more for content based films and writers in the industry than almost any other mainstream star. you go girl!  At All India Radio. V different from any media place I've been in. As sarkaari as it gets. 
Air France - Diary of Traveler 2nd week winning article: “Around the World in 77 Days” by Thiagarajan Suryanarayanan.   What an amazing Kahaani! great film. Big congrats to Vidya Balan, director and story writer !  thanks! 
With no more exposes expected, getting same feeling as one got after the Cricket World Cup. Now what?  Your voice has given hope to a lot of real life lovers. #happybirthdayshreyaghoshal !  hello - and love! :* 
Ok V bad one: Q to Vadra: Why were you so friendly with DLF? Ans: kyonki har ek friend zaroori hota hai..naaa na nana na na na na nana..  thanks!  So you want to know how the 500,000 books were shipped? Here is a short video:  (by Ankit Pahwa) 
Vadra's expose was like the iPhone launch. Gadkari i dont know, maybe like an OS upgrade.  'Clear away the family cobwebs'| Chetan Bhagat | TOI Column today:   thank u! 
Until Khurshid, the only person I knew working with pen and blood was Stephenie Meyer of Twilight.  thanks!  thank u! 
Many used to say Mr Khurshid is a gentleman. People who speak good English in clipped accents can be just as evil. Please realize that.  thanks!  thank u! 
"now, will fight with blood" this, the law minister of world's biggest democracy. Way to go:   In Dubai for the Emirates Litfest. Bet u didnt have this for breakfast before!   good point 
Gadkari revelations expected at 5:30pm Twitter flood of Gadkari jokes expected by 5:31pm  happy birthday mr tharoor!  thanks! 
Just waiting for someone in the Congress to say that Vadra is an RSS agent who had planned this all along.  hi guys  On NDTV 24X7 "Your call" at 930pm tonight. hosted by Anusha and kids make rare appearance. Watch if free. 
baat khulne to do meri jaan  Happy women's day all! RT One of the best articles by Must read on this women's day :)   thanks! 
if Chowmein causes rape, what does Maggi cause? 2 minute molestation?  all of you make my life more colourful. Happy Holi!  Revolution 2020 is a story about corruption. Reading a pirated version defeats the point. Please don't. 
If chow mein causes rape, why isn't everyone in China behaving like Ranjeet?  Is Rahul Gandhi = Bahadur Shah Zafar? Had written it in Sep-11.   :) thanks 
Of course chow mein causes rape. Haven't you seen the Mainland China 'where's the chef' ad?  Congress not winning Amethi and Raebareli is like a Rajnikant movie not getting an opening in Chennai.  thanks! 
Somewhere in India, a son-in-law must have said "par yeh sab maine aapki beti ki khushi ke liye kiya."  I have nothing against the Congress. Just develop a spine and stop worshipping a family despite their wrongs. Be a leader. Not a spoon.  Have been wanting to ask this (for those who have read Revolution 2020), how does Aarti Pradhan come across- nice, confused or manipulative? 
Called DLF sales office for a project. Said give me the Vadra rate please. They hung up. No sense of humor I tell you.  Will be SO much fun to watch the Congress sycophants defend the family tonight on news debates. Sheer entertainment.  hey thanks gul. Do read! 
arey jaao PM saheb, damaad ji mushkil mein hai. pehle unhe bachao.  I am happy that I live in a country where people are no longer enamored by a family that shields the corrupt and is too arrogant to talk.  oh wow! Thank u! 
but you will have to talk there na sirjee..  Gandhi family better slowly handover power to other Congress leaders, esp state level. Else they will be reduced to a tourist attraction.  well fiction is lies too right? Somehow lies seem to matter more. 
Investigations aside, perceptions: FB poll results, do you think Vadra is corrupt: Yes (89%), No (2%), Can't Say (9%):   The end of Gandhi's family stature as we knew it for the last six decades. Will never be the same. They are famous, but can't win elections.  Revolution 2020 trending for 3 days non-stop. Little embarrassed. Thank you for the buzz and compliments. 
Just to see perceptions on FB, did a simple poll. Q: Acc to you, is Robert Vadra corrupt. Choices: yes, no, can't say.   The Gandhi family is a liability for the Congress, not strength. When I said this, ppl laughed. Wonder if they are now:   happy bday rahul! 
how Vadra make 300cr? he played KBC with the same one question asked 100 times - who's my in laws? a) gandhi b) gandhi c) gandhi d) gandhi  Salman Khurshid, of will get hanged for muslim quota fame, had put his wife in a safe Muslim area seat. She is trailing. 3rd place.  hi there! Thank u 
Titanic:Iceberg = Gandhis: Vadra  Congress trailing in Amethi. In 3rd place. Decimation. Family moon seems in total lunar eclipse.  Of the 102 reviews of Revolution 2020 in flipkart, 84 rate it 5 on 5 stars. This has never happened to me. Thank you.  
The IAS needs to go on strike once and bring the bullying netas to their knees. Act like a wimp, and you will be treated like one.  Yeh kya hua? Rahul G haar gaye. Phir se?  For those who missed the launch yesterday. Webcast link:  
IAS officers, some of the smartest people in the country, reduced to wimps as unethical politicians control their careers. Fight! Save India  enjoy the treat!  thanks! 
Ashok Khemka, IAS standing up against Vadra. Good opportunity for the rest of IAS to back him and fight the arbitrary transfer rules.  If they win, it will be his victory. If they lose, it won't be his fault. Guess who?  thanks! 
Indian news is usually the best reality show on air, entertainment channels included.  thanks! :)  Delhi launch is an invite-only publisher event. Tho email anubha(at)chetanbhagat.com if u dying to come, explaining why!Will swing sm passes 
Really bold and fearless AajTak/ Headlines Today journos in SK presscon. Commendable. Glad media now understands diversion tactics.  New DP.  In Delhi. to launch Revolution 2020 tonight. to read. 
Never, ever, lose your cool in a press conference. Khurshid is. Backfiring. Emotions matter more on TV than reason.  Here's what Indian voters care about most - caste, religion, teaching the other caste and religion a lesson, and well caste and religion  Good Morning all. "The bootlegging of education", my column in TOI today:  
Khurshid's level-2 chamchas (chamcha's chamchas) defending him in his own press con and clapping for each other is just a big #fail.  here only...  Thank you. 
The bigger issue is why on earth do Ministers and their relatives open NGOs which get regular funds from the government?  GDP growth & FDI down. Inflation & deficit up. The economy is worsening. Voters don't care. So, the politicians don't care.  thanks! 
same here!  In Bhopal tomo, for a public talk, 3pm, 2nd March, Ravindra Bhawan Campus. Come. Those in city would have seen the ads.   ha ha. I got the msg! Thx 
It is sad when a loyal pet who does everything to save his master is abandoned the moment he has a little infection, no?  Get married today. The anniversary gifts you can save...  thanks! 
So at 10% per annum interest rate, Khurshid's 71lakhs works out to around 20minutes of interest on 1,86,000cr, the alleged 2G scam loss.  i am not. but no more explaining. :)  At venue. Amazing crowd. Super sweet wears colour co-ordinated clothes to match the revolution 2020 cover. Looks stunning. 
:)  Revolution 2020 talked about rampant growth of substandard pvt colleges. Glad to hear AICTE may not approve more:   thanks nikhil...got ur msg too! 
S Khurshid in seriously big trouble, for 71 lakhs. Wonder if A Raja and Kalmadi fell off their chair laughing.  One of my mistakes is I've explained myself too much, to not come across as arrogant. Done with that. No more explaining.  The task: getting ready. The challenge: to not look like total idiot next to the stylish #notgonnahappen. 
congrats shashi!  Hi guys. The 3 mistakes of my life now in chinese. check out the cover!   :) 
Anuj Tela is this week's Air France-Diary of a Traveler winner. Contest open. Put in as many entries as you want here   does he eh?  Revolution 2020 is trending. Wow. Abhi padh to lo yaar. Thank u! 
There's a popular show abroad called the weakest link. Vadra. Got it? Good.  So yesterday's 'family moon' column caused a bit of a flutter. for those who missed (do read the comments too):   Revolution 2020 in stores now. And 700 people from alone roaming across the streets delivering pre-orders. 
PM making big claims on corruption reforms. Announce an investigation on Vadra for a start. U r are the PM for God's sake. Be a sardar once!  In the beautiful city of Perth, Australia to deliver the closing address for the perth writers festival. Speaking on Ind-Aus relations.  :) 
Somewhere in India, wonder if one man must have called his brother-in-law and said, "don't worry jiju, sab thik ho jayega."  thanks!  Revolution 2020 | Grand book launch | Today, Oct 7, 6:30pm| With | At Inorbit Malad  
My heart goes out to the Congress Spokespersons. Jaao, damaad ji to bachao. Ji madam.  thanks!  thanks! And congrats on xuv! 
Swapan Dasgupta (@swapan55) killing it on Times Now today. Awesome.  'Rahul, Robert and other family moons', my col in TOI today:   At ISKCON chowpatty, mumbai. Offered a copy on the big day to Krishna. Blessings! Now to Siddhivinayak. 
In every zoo, some poor guy has the job of cleaning the animals' shit. Some party spokespersons remind me of that guy.  Let other airlines run KF planes,and share revenue with the lenders. No disruption to airline sector schedule, fairest solution for lenders.  GM! listening to jeeturaj on 98.3fm mirchi talk abt #revolution2020 and the chetan and bhagat in rascals! 
Don't know what is more disturbing. The govt does these shady deals, or that they feel there is nothing wrong in them.  bankrupt. yep. u said it.  thanks khats! 
Govt bullies farmers and acquires land. Then sells it to private developers cheap. This is the govt farmers vote for. Well done IAC.  no assets. all leases. and loans.  :) u r the first one! 
Slowly, but surely, India will be cleaned up. I remain optimistic. Because eventually, good wins over evil. Always. Good Night people!  Lenders shd check if thr r personal guarantees from promoters & enforce them, rather than give new money.If no guarantees,oops,u've been had  Dear God, leaving it all in your hands for tomorrow.Take care of me, like you always have, despite my flaws. Good Night. 
Look at the insincere, arrogant, loud people who've sold their conscience and come to defend the indefensible. India deserves better.  I've been a distressed debt banker. Not the biggest expert on KF, but can say a) it will never make money, b) lenders will never get repaid.  Heading to Times Now studios for a night-before-the-launch special on #revolution2020 on the News Hour with Arnab. Live at 10pm! 
And hate it when people make it a 'you must be against the congress' issue. No buddy, the guy got sweet deals. Why? That's the issue.  Funny how nationalized banks can't save farmers from committing suicides, but wants to save never-made-money Kingfisher  thank u mahesh! 
Private person privacy logic also is silly. Private person is close relative of powerful politician, and he did off-market deals. why?  Run an airline. If you make money, it is all yours. If you lose, SBI will rescue you. Shame if SBI rescues Kingfisher :   The toughest part of being a writer? the day before the launch jitters. 1 day to go. Cya tomo 630pm, Inorbit Malad with 
Silly Vadra debates on TV whether deals were illegal or not. Point is deals were off-market, done with a relative of a politician. Why?  pl send a number to contact asap!  Excellence, Innovation and making people happy - values Steve Jobs stood for. Thank you God for making him. Am v sad and shaken. 
But what on earth does 'Kai Po Che!' mean? still figuring out, but see here:   booked flights to perth via sing kf. U guys cancelled flt so plan haywire. Want refund. Nobody picks helpline. Pl contact.  He was my hero. My inspiration. My role model. Steve Jobs, there never was, never will be anyone as cool as you. RIP :( 
If everything is fine, just explain this to me, how did Mr Robert Vadra get so rich so soon?  thanks! Came out well.  oh thanks! 
Kai Po Che!, hindi movie based on 3 Mistakes, shooting almost done. releases 11.1.13. here's a super sneak peek:   Nice candid one 'RT EXCLUSIVE: An interview with Chetan Bhagat:   An interviewer asked me this question today - 'do u think ppl take u more seriously than u take yourself?'. Hell, yeah! 
GM all! my col in TOI today, 'when marathis hurt marathis.' hope people take it in the right context. :  Everyone, can love everyone. Happy Valentine's Day.  My walkabout interview in stephens college with airs at 10pm on CNN-IBN tonite. #revolution2020 
It's good that there's someone out there who cares about art, and is working towards bringing it to the masses.   :)  The #revolution2020 launch on Oct 7 at Inorbit Malad, 630pm. Come if u can, else register for the webcast:  
KF lenders won't get their money back. Well, but they may get some pretty awesome calendars.  I like puppet shows. Asin in jaipur, via a friend.   Oh and dear Infoscians, I am sorry. You r not a bodyshop. U just have hot bodies. Forgive me. I am an idiot sometimes. Now smile. 
Feel sad for KF staff. Made to work for free through this year. Now, they are in line with lenders. Don't feel sad for the foolish banks tho  'Porn, parliament and other bad things," my column in TOI today:   Oh and dear Infoscians, I am sorry. You r not a bodyshop. U just have hot bodies. Forgive me. I am an idiot sometimes. Now smile. 
Am surprised Kingfisher still has an equity value of Rs1,180cr, despite 8,000cr+ of debt ahead of it. Hope the denial ends soon.  thanks!  Ok - so totally overhyping this - but some v senior journos read #Revolution2020 and they all gave thumbs up! Your turn day after. 
Also, had said Kingfisher will never make money or repay debts ( Now, shutdown. Banks will b lucky to recover 10%.  thanks :)  I have never, ever had a problem apologizing. I have no idea why people make a big deal of it. Sometimes we hurt unintentionally. Let it go. 
had said govt can cut deficit from land sales ( ), ppl laughed. Now they are doing the same ( )  Let's give the poor ministers some #PorngateExcuses . Will RT the best. "I was just checking download speeds on the 3G network."  And if someone got hurt. Well, apologies. Some students got hurt too. Do remember that. Now - u know what Aarti did in #revolution2020? 
Happy Birthday Mahatma Gandhi. Not quite the India you'd have wanted, but striving to get there.  Saw the L Modi-Arnab G debate. V entertaining. Seriously, is not for the faint hearted.   I don't need it. All is well. And I have to ship 500,000 books by the weekend. Pls no distractions. All respects to NRN/IIT/Infy. Chill! 
Details of the Air France/CB contest are here. Padh lo, samajh lo:   #AlternateUsesofChetanBhagatBooks : mousepad   Totally overblown IIT issue. Someone made high-handed statement. I didn't like choice of words. Showed them how high-handedness can hurt. 
Doing a fun contest with AIR FRANCE. Write a short note on a memorable trip, win tickets to anywhere worldwide. See:   #AlternateUsesofChetanBhagatBooks : as a fly swatter, hand fan, assault weapon, elbow rest, book cricket, racquet  thanks g. And congrats on #force. Been so super tied up. Hv to catch it soon. Heard only good things! 
What's the best way to describe what Australia is doing to India in SL?  :)  thank u ab! 
congrats!! HI Chetan. My new book 'Chanakya's New Manifesto: To resolve the Crisis Within India' out Jan 2013  Tough 'thorny' interview for the Telegraph. Thank them for giving me a chance to express my views:   2 days to go...ok, I admit it. I am nervous one moment, excited the other...mind playing games 
Gm all! Have a great sunday! My col in TOI today :   Been driving this 6.3 liter AMG all morning. Now i know what space travel feels like.   I have heard the Stephens cafeteria is v good. True? Any must try items? 
thank u for live tweeting!  At the newly opened Cafe Zoe at parel (next to blue frog). Simply gorgeous!    Heading to St. Stephens College to record an interview with Haven't been to DU in decades. Looking fwd. 
Hi guys. Doing a talk on life and success in Chennai on Sep 22 as part of a charity fundraiser event. Come if you can:   So 6.2liter engine! They told me they have limited the speed to 250km/h. Oh thanks, I'd have breached that without realizing it.  Lovely newshour with Mohandas Pai of Infosys. We agree with each other. All is well. Any supposed 'fight' is media imagination. 
Wondering about the current behavior of the govt allies? Heard the phrase 'like mice leaving a sinking ship'?  So Merc sending me this new AMG they launched, to test over the weekend. Sigh, the hard work I do to make a living.   So is there a new Iphone? What's the verdict? 
Now might be a good time to plan and quickly execute that one final scam.  Wondering if people following are boys side and people following are the girls side? I'm both.  #nowplaying You are my chamak chalo. Kinda catchy. 
thank u!  Congrats to and for their wedding today. Flower petals filled tweets coming your way!  Vaise, running down lower batches seems to be quite common. "The standard of students is falling every year" - prof cherian in FPS. 
thanks!!  So there is proof that there are at least 700,000 cool people in this world. Thank you tweeple for your love!  Mr murthy had a point, but wish he wasn't so sweepingly high handed. Fix the system. No point judging students. 
And i hope my favorable stance on retail FDI makes it clear that I am not beholden to any one party or individual. So trolls, stop!  :)  It is ironic when someone who runs a body shopping company and calls it hi-tech, makes sweeping comments on the quality of IIT students. 
Not allowing FDI in retail is like not allowing foreign authors to sell in India. Open the economy. Learn to compete.  So there is proof that there's at least 700,000 cool people in this world. Thank you tweeple for your love!  IITians have made a great contribution in making Infosys what it is. Hope people remember that. 
FDI in retail is a good thing. Pros and cons, but overall good. Patriotism no excuse to justify inefficiency.  Well done ! You are a do-er!  In times of 150crore movies, people are still excited about a simple book and a simple story. Thank you! Happy ashtami. 
I see the promos of Barfi! and then I see the PM, and I am like...oh well, better not say anything seditionish.  I am proud of the Supreme Court of India. Loads of courage shown in canceling 122 licences.  :) thanks! 
Release #assemtrivedi now. Like really.  SC scraps 122 2G licences. Huge impact as confirms wrongdoing. New players suffer most. Unitech stock down 10%, Bharti up 6%.  thank u dear :) i do read 
Scamsters who give away country's resources to friends for free are guilty of sedition, not cartoonists.  ha ha. no IPO tho! we tweeted the letter same time!  No special dressing up required to be part of show audience. Do consider taking a bath though. 
Arresting a young, anti-corruption cartoonist? UPA totally lost the plot? Disastrous political move. Just erased urban youth vote.  Haven't read a financial document in 4 years. But couldn't resist the Facebook IPO prospectus! Miss banking, sometimes.   Just to be clear - recording 'On the Couch with Koel' in 3 hours at Landmark, Ambience Vasant Kunj. If u want to join the show, show up! 
Gm all! 'Climbing out of the coal pit,' my col in TOI today:   Focus on Impact, Moving Fast, Boldness, Being Open and Building Social Value: facebook's values, match mine totally.   Recording show at Landmark Bookstore, Ambience Mall, Vasant Kunj, Delhi at noon. With live audience. Come and join if you can! 
thank u!  So you know how my haters judge the kind of people who like my books? Well, she does. Now what?:   :) it is coming 
thank u!  Someone's feeling neglected as the controversy died down and the country moved on. Hence the personal attacks. Will pass. Peace.  So this is how my books are printed. A quick 1-minute video from the printing press:  (thanks Ankit Pahwa) 
Be so busy improving yourself that you have no time to criticize others.  'What makes the Jaipur Litfest rock?', my column in TOI today :   Beautiful People episode:  
One negative person in your life can destroy a 100 positive thoughts. Kick such people out of your life. Completely!  One love. One country. Happy Republic Day!  Heard book lovers city Kolkata alone has booked 75,000 copies of #revolution2020. Thanks kol! 
So this is embarassingly late, but my account is verified now. Thanks for trusting me all this while. Someone as stupid could only be me!  In a hostage situation, becomes difficult to take bold decisions.bigger q is, how did it come about?all to blame?only govt? ok nuff tweeting  4 days to go...less than 100 hours. 
Still doesn't make up for the pain people suffered, but justice has been served. Good day for India.  Anyway,i respect other points of view on this as well.The state was soft, kinda true. .always is.Hope ppl respect my freedom of speech too.  If you are truly secular, listen to both sides and work things out. Not sit in an ivory tower and judge everyone. 
There are people in the country who do believe that since the PM has written a note in a polite, dignified language, he should be forgiven.  Images of stalls being broken in Jaipur cud have been flashed across the world.Tourism drops, locals lose jobs. Liberals go home. Want that?  Admire the article (prev tweet). Some media claiming to be secular are more interested in branding ppl communal than heal differences. 
Coal mines belonging to the country given away to friends. CAG reports the loss. However, there are still some people supporting the govt.  I have no issues bashing the government when it is deserved. I have. But I can't have a constant negative bias which isn't objective. Sorry.  in that ai flight. Don't actually get off 
Dear PM, don't tell us how you shouldn't be blamed. Tell us why you didn't take care of national interest first, when that was your job.  India is a free country with free speech. Relax. Yesterday was a specific incident caused by extremes on both sides that Jaipur didn't want.  Total 5am Jab We Met happening at Kota. So, Kota-Jaipur road not good. Hence, Kota-Udaipur drive then flight via Jodhpur to Delhi. 
Have worked as a commodities analyst for five years. The CAG methodology may be simplistic, but is fundamentally correct.  When extremists on both sides turn a festival into an activist venue, there's a security risk. Jaipur thrives on tourism.Why risk its image?  Kota station shuts down due to goods train derailment. Got to find a way to Delhi now. 
Sick. How the government is not accepting mistakes in coal allocations and blaming everyone.  The same government allowed the interview to be telecast on national TV. Can someone give any credit to that?Or is govt hating the new cool?  Addressed one of the biggest audiences I ever have in Kota. Overwhelmed. 
Gm all! My col in TOI today, for my North East friends. Dunno y comments disabled! TOI pl fix.   Many are giving anti-govt speeches on the lack of freedom of speech. Do they see the irony?  coming bro! 
When an asset transfer is made, it is a transfer in value. When asset is monetized is irrelevant. Illogical govt stmts shud b seen thru.  thanks!  coming soon my dear. Whenever the organizers tell me too. 
Coal unmined means no loss. So, money stolen but not spent and kept in the bank means money not stolen right?  Nobody wants to talk balance, middle ground, consensus, reconciliation, humility even as they all want to ride on a lovely fest for people.  Driving on NH76 to the place where more physics, chemistry and maths problems are solved than anyplace on earth - Kota. 
Or the classic way to argue by a person with weak reasoning is - assuming their intention good, ur intention bad. baseless and irrelevant.  In a fight between extreme fundamentalists and extreme liberals, the sufferer is the beautiful jaipur litfest, the gainer an appeasing govt.  Here's the link. Thanks gaurav. "@GauravVyas_13:  Direct Link Sir" 
When people run out of reason or logical arguments they make personal attacks.  So Open mag takes half my quote (ignores my saying there shd b no ban) & calls me a 'sophisticated imam'.how open no?:   Dainik Bhaskar has carried an exclusive, unreleased excerpt of Revolution 2020 today. Translated. Pg 2 Rasrang. See epaper.bhaskar.com 
thank u!!!  If you are truly religious,you believe in forgiveness. If you are truly liberal,you respect other points of view. Sadly, don't see it much.  One of the most beautiful views as I wake up in Udaipur. Good Morning world!  
Stand up for your rights citizens, or you shall no longer have them. We are a democracy, not a dictatorship. Satire is free speech, my right  lol  :) thx 
What kind of democracy can't take a bit of satire? What kind of government tramples on individual freedoms so callously?  Extreme fundamentalists. Extreme liberals. Extremely difficult to deal with either.  thanks 
The real PMO has offended the people of India far more than any fake parody account can or ever will.  My interview with the economist at the #jlf :   thx 
true true!  The girl in the pic, unaware to the writer or photographer here i guess, happens to be the wife. :):   thx 
Some lines that motivate me:   Thank u for allowing me a chance to explain my views on rushdie visit rather than jumping to conclusions.   thx! 
If all goes well, will have a new sentimental love story in Diwali 2013 for you guys. No more details yet. Thank you for being there - CB  Lovely trip to #jlf. Big congrats to organizers for an event that's put india on the map n brought it more glory than the CWG. Bye jaipur!  My interview on "beautiful people" airs at 9pm tonight on CNBC. Watch if u can. 
Hence, will be withdrawing a little bit from here. Need to reflect on what i want to do. Feeling a bit lost.  And i didnt say anything i havent said on twitter in the past week. Be balanced. And dont react to tweets by haters who hate anyway.  In Udaipur for a talk. View from my room in the king's palace.  
However, feeling drained after being in the public eye so much after the release. Also, craving to do fiction.  I didnt use any term like 'banned writers'. It makes no sense. No writer is banned. But it makes spicy copy.  Does Jet Airways web-check in ever work? 
Hi All, good sales as well as reviews for 'what young india wants', way beyond my expectations for what was a compilation. Thank you.  Ok so the kids pic on front page of telegraph today are my twins at #jlf (the paper didn't realize it is them!)   My publisher confirms that Revolution 2020 will be on sale in bookstores by early morning 7 Oct 2011. 
And met the tigress. Probably the prettiest tigress you shall ever see.   I actually feel bad for haters on twitter. They have to keep hating to keep their social currency alive on twitter.  v good. Amen 
Saw ek tha tiger. In single screen theatre. Smash hit.  At #jlf today. 230pm mughal tent. Surviving the twitterati. With and u dont wanna miss this one!  Everytime you stick your neck out, there is risk it could get chopped off. But if you never do, you won't get anywhere. 
:)  I have lost count lf the number of times my arguments have been twisted the wrong way to make a more sensational story.  7 days. Next friday. Tryst with Destiny. Soar or crash, that is the question. 
Happy Independence Day. Thank you freedom fighters for giving us a free nation. Great to be Indian.  Listening to 'subah hone na de' as i get ready for my litfest session at 10. Not v literary i know. But what a catchy song.  was nice to meet u..thanks! 
thank u!  Six 'don't-miss' sessions at Jaipur Litfest, acco to WSJ: beautiful people promo. Airs this weekend:  
aww thank u...    Pranab Mukherji has shown that Bengalis are v calm and patient, but if u upset them, boy r u in trouble! 
Can everybody please do 'far more serious work.' Thanks.  And those who think literature means being all serious, pl stay away from my sessions. And get a life.  The wonderful ,actor, voracious reader & fearless in sharing her opinions will launch Revolution 2020. Oct7,6:30,Inorbit Malad 
dear pakistani friends, happy independence day! Am sure you are doing fine. But imagine, if no partition, you could have had sachin too.  Just as some food items are labelled fat free, I wonder if one day books will have stickers that say fatwa-free.  lol lol lol... 
He said your criticism falls in two categories - one you are stupid or two, you are cunning. How can u b both at the same time? Ya. How?  Heading to Jaipur tonight! Cya tomo 10am at my session in the Litfest. I talk about girls, writing, national issues and well, more girls.  Recorded beautiful people for CNBC with ,one of india's finest journalists. Good fun. 
Did a stimulating interview with of Financial Times, who had done good research on me, incl my critics.  Mumbaiites, request by organizers to check out the youth fest INSPIRO2012 on 21Jan, Sat at somaiya grounds, sion! See   he's in aiims no? Let's pack a picnic basket and send it for the inmates? U can wrap her sandwiches, with love. 
Anyway, drama continues. Take it easy folks. Good Night.  good point  but u think about her. She who has woken up to another lousy jail breakfast 
Baba seems prepared, but hope he knows what he is doing. Potential conflict of interest if too close to NDA. What if NDA scam discovered?  Priyanka Gandhi is so charming. I am going to vote for Congress. Many Indian voters have this logic.  Thinking of what you don't have a lot more than what you do is a sure shot way to live an unhappy life. 
It is disgusting that we have to do street protests and see regular dramas to seek laws that prevent people from stealing.  All those who opposed Anna and the Lokpal, and had faith in the current system, do send best wishes to Kalmadi for walking out free.  hi 
Other parties also steal. The BJP does too. But it is no defense for not taking strong anti-corruption steps. Or staying silent.  Kalmadi gets bail. A country whose citizens care about caste and religion more than truth and justice, deserves this.  of course! Hi! 
Congress steals money. People ask Congress not to. Those people are called anti-congress and politically motivated. Stealing forgotten.  Revolution 2020. 100 days. 1,000,000 copies. Thank you all! Rupa's contest to mark occasion:   same here. Thanks! 
thanks! was fun!  One more attempt to decipher me. This time respected Ms Ira Pande talks abt me in a video. Love her expressions!   What everyone involved in the 2G scam is saying is this: I didn't tweet anything. I merely retweeted. 
nice. Thanks!  thank u!  Fact: On board the plane that took the PM to New York and back, there was a copy of Revolution 2020. Will reveal who soon. 
thank u!!!!  Unless you are particularly into fatwa-lit, welcome to attend my session at Jaipur litfest on 21st Jan, sat, at 10am:   First day all india booking of 500,000 copies of Revolution 2020 with my publisher. Thank you! 
was v good!  Looking forward to Jaipur litfest this weekend. If anyone is paying money for hurling a shoe at me, let me know. Will hurl it on myself.  A significant part of Revolution 2020 is set in Kota. Am coming there for a public talk on Oct 2. Check local papers for details 
Rare to see Indian politicians talk in such a straightforward, sensible manner. watch & here:   the govt raised a voice and assured to protect MF. they havent done that here. it is subtle.  A very nicely written, calm rebuttal to my col on minorities, by a Muslim. Thanks. I accept the points.  
The Delhi panel discussion of "What Young India Wants" with me, with Sunil Sethi:   giving in to bullies..  So now, have an official 'revolution' cupcake partner for launch. 7th oct, 630pm inorbit malad, mumbai. See ya all! 
thanks!  Both r wrong"@sagarikaghose: appeasement of Muslims on Rushdie and of Hindus by allowing Hussain to die in exile in London?"  Came to a cute bakery called 'love, sugar and dough'. Asked them if they will do cupcakes for all at launch. They agreed. 
Hi All, "The real political opportunity from Anna," my column in TOI today:   Don't like paintings and writings that insult a religion. Still, Hussain and Rushdie shd be allowed in India.That is my country's greatness.  Video chat on flipkart.com tomo sep 28 at 430pm. U ask q's on text chat. I answer on video. Will post details. 
thanks buddy!  both are wrong actions sagarika.  Happy Birthday Google. You have helped me look smarter than I am on several occasions. 
nice..thanks!  If you have to appease and pander, at lease appease the modern thinking Muslims. A govt with a PhD PM is listening to fundamentalists. Sad.  Poll results: Women lead men on: 18%, Men pick up wrong signals: 82%. Oh well. Women always win. 
Thanks for all the support. The lotus has a wax coating, so the muck doesn't stick. Be like that. Good Night!  That said, sad that Rushdie may not attend Jaipur litfest. He should be allowed. But our secular government will do anything to appease.  Do women lead men on? Or is it usually men who get the wrong signals? Revolution 2020 tries to explore this. What is ur experience? 
thank u PM!  I have always challenged the norm and I speak up more than others. I can disturb, but only for a purpose. Slandering religion serves none.  bhojpuri me pucho, phir de denge. 
thank u!  Flattering to b compared w Salman Rushdie in this column, but the claim that 'i don't disturb peace' is not true:   10 days to go. 100 things to do. A 1000000 ppl to please! 
thanks rahul!!!  : thank u!  Jokes apart, I guess a lot of people have money as their primary motivator. I don't. Impossible to leave an i-banking salary otherwise. 
On Headlines Today at 9.30pm today with  lol  Oh forgot to mention, they will pay me also. That helps too ;) 
thanks!!  but ya, the guy could have used a bookmark, taken a break, and then continued reading.  For now Huawei will be tech parter for the Revolution 2020 launch/ contests. Will try my best to get u guys as many free phones as I can! 
Can Chetan Bhagat change the non-fiction game? - Home -    I thot it is kinda cute and different:   Did it coz 1) never tried anything like this before, 2) tried their phones, surprisingly, v good and 3) they are huge:  
lol  For those who still haven't seen the naughty promo (PG recommended, 18+ only, not for serious types):   So, did a brand association tie-up with Chinese Telecom giant Huawei. First time for me. Did it for 3 main reasons. 
Hari, Shyam, Govind, Krish, Gopal - all my protagonists named after Krishna. So, millions think his name when they read. Happy Janamasthmi!  Better than sex? I like :   Finished my last meditation class. One of the most transformative weeks of my life. Airport in a couple of hours. Miss home. 
Dear Krishna, you are my guiding light. Fun, love, wisdom and justice - everything you stand for, I do too. Happy Janamashtmi!  :) thanks!  hi there 
I am scared to wish people for Janamashtmi today because I'll be accused of speaking popular hinduism.  Girls, there's no need to buy expensive bags, shoes or make-up. Just smile. It does the job of making you beautiful.  People will throw lit matchsticks at you. It is upto you if you want to catch fire or not. 
because it was based on my book. thanks.  :) thanks!  The Revolution 2020 launch: Oct 7 - Mumbai (Inorbit Malad, 6pm), Oct 8 - Delhi, Oct 13 - New York. Other cities/details to come. 
Wearing FabIndia, visiting Khan Market and cribbing about all things popular doesn't make u an intellectual. Intellect does.And that's rare.  :)  Best wishes to , John A and all others in team 'Force.' 
Mr wise journo asked why i sold so much. i said maybe lucky or destiny. he calls answer 'mix of popular hinduism and corporate speak.' wow!  I've seen hundreds, maybe thousands of beautiful things in this world. Yet, few things come close to seeing a woman smile.  "Don't let them divide and rule," my TOI col today.  
I am no messiah. No youth icon. No authority. No great thinker. I wrote books. People read it. Lots of people. That's it. Haters may relax.  Someone should make an app, every time a girl changes her profile picture on fb/twitter, there is applause. will b a big hit.  Good Morning All! My last day in beautiful, beautiful Koh Samui. Did a 5-day detox. Feel rejuvenated and...hungry! 
i know baba..just feel bad for them, they need attention too..  thanks! and best of luck for the exam!  Hi All, leaving for Koh Samui, Thailand for one week of peace, meditation, yoga and detox to calm my nerves before the launch. No net. Bye! 
and the 'recently i saw..recently released' gaffe happened on TOI edit desk.I didn't send that copy.anyone in journalism shd know how it is.  I think women change their profile pics 5 times more than men. And then they say they are not attention seekers.  Longish interview on Revolution 2020 and life, in the wall street journal:  
And here's a retort to my phulka-making wives column, which was about men's attitudes, but she took it personally:   There comes a time in a man's life..when he has to change his profile pic. V arranged marriage intro photo types, I know.  Happy to announce that we did a recruitment process on twitter. We hired to work in my team. She starts Wednesday. Congrats! 
rushed off a flight to the interview. Hence, was wearing sneakers. But Sherlock Holmes journo found it 'carefully cultivated look'. Thanks!  Going to the Perth Writers Festival on Feb 26 for the closing address on India. Perthians, be kind, it was just a game:   "Letter to my readers", my new blog:  
I like Tehelka. here's a nice ranty piece about me. Wish the guy just said "I don't like you CB!":   Good Morning All! "Games politicians play: The politics of prejudice," col in TOI today. Do read:   hi sir. it was all in good humor. i appreciate ur anti corruption work. don't believe what ppl keep sending u on twitter. 
thanks for coming!  I find religion based quotas offensive. So do many others. Can we ban the government for it?  :) 
:)  This is not about FB/ Google. This is about your voice. They are killing it. Make sure everyone in your college/org knows what's happening.  Between meals, am I technically on fast? 
yes!!!  Govt doing FB/ Google witchhunt to prevent future Anna type movements. Be careful. The youth need to raise voice or they'll lose it forever.  thanks for sharing ur intentions. 
Heading to Crossword Kemps Corner soon for the WYIW book launch. Hope to see some of you guys!  Religion based quotas won't divide our people. Google will. Our government's logic.  20 days to Revolution 2020. 
thanks so much rohinton, means a lot, coz i have loved your books growing up!  Blaming facebook and google for objectionable content is like blaming a notebook company because someone wrote bad things in their notebook  thanks! 
thanks so much!  I don't know what has happened to the team. #depression  Yuvi and gauti eat quite normally. Gauti a little quiet types. Yuvi has a nice sense of humor. 
'What young india wants' launch + panel discussion on same topic with and me. Crossword kemps. 7pm  The good thing if the match ends early is there is more time for go-karting.  At lunch on the same table with yuvi and gauti. Thanks india today summit #mindrocks. Want to see how much they eat! 
This evening. 7 pm. Crossword Kemps Corner, mumbai. We discuss 'what young india wants' - from jobs to social issues to sex. See ya!  Pl help him"@kamaalrkhan: If can have 668k followers then I can have 6 millions because he is very small star compare to KRK.  Seeing Modi at is oratorial best. Wondering if u did a RG vs Modi debate, who would win? 
no plans yet but will let u know!  Big congratulations to the team of Nanban! The tamil remake of 3 Idiots.   CM Modi's open letter. Finally some public remorse. This could be a bigger game changer than what people think. 
The mumbai launch tomo is open to all. One tip: come early. 7pm tomo aug 9 at crossword kemps corner. C ya!  Feel like changing something? How about yourself.  thanks ! 
'what young india wants' mumbai launch tomo aug 9, 7pm, crossword kemps corner with Come!  :)  And while I am venting, STOP calling me youth icon. And definitely stop saying u r youth icon, don't write about sex. new book has sex. ok? 
Fantastic initial reviews of "What young India wants" at Flipkart. Some of them here. Thank you!   Perhaps even I could not have articulated it like this. Thanks Tanuj Khosla! "How Good is Chetan Bhagat's English",   Saw a blog in nyt on grammatical errors in Indian novels. Then saw the end tags. they had spelt my name wrong.  
so home shop 18 has 2 solid deals. One one 'what young india wants', and the other on Huawei Y200 phone (Rs6.8k only!):   :)  for the 1000th time - if an Indian character is expected to speak in a certain way, that's what the dialogue will reflect. 
but have they accepted?  2 lovely ladies, from 2 states. Great to meet up with and Asin at 's b'day yest!   4 editors, all English experts, have edited revolution2020 10+ times. They know what I am doing. Critics often don't. Sorry to say. 
"What Young India Wants," my book of columns and some new essays, releases Aug 6, 2012. Here's a simple promo:   thank u for everything! u r welcome  And I try to catch authentic dialogue that matches the character. even if that isn't correct queen's English. Duh! 
happy birthday!  Meanwhile, the CEC has offered that the drapes left after covering the elephant statues, can be used to cover offending authors.  I don't write in Hinglish. Simple English yes, Hinglish no. 
It is controversial, but we need to think about giving immunity to legislators who pass the Lokpal bill. Else won't happen. #Realitycheck  nice..thanks!  pavan have asked webmaster to chk. harish, see pavans tweet to me re blog feeds 
thank u ji.  Nice article on 'Forgiveness in Islam'. Almost moved me to tears.   I like Delhi. 
true..but mistakes were made.  However, I hope we r a mature enough country that we don't prevent visitors.Even if they've erred, isn't forgiveness part of every religion?  In Delhi for the India Today youth summit tomo. looking forward. 
I did, in July 2011, met and gave civil society these negotiation suggestions. I didn't cut much ice. Makes sense now?:   I don't like people offending anyone's religion. If they have done so by mistake, they could and should consider apologizing.  Watch Mind Rocks LIVE www.indiatoday.in/mindrockson Sept 17, 8.30am onwards. Tweet using #mindrocks & I may answer your Question 
Sometimes you support a person by simply cheering them. But sometimes, support means giving feedback and a reality check. That's me.  Either you don't let them erect statues first place, or let them be. Poor people need blankets more than the statues need drapes.  Massive flooding on road between T1 to T3 at delhi airport. Avoid unless u have a hovercraft. 
What is disheartening is when you support team Anna, their supporters cheer u. But when you give feedback, you become the enemy. Immature.  Doesn't draping the elephant statues in Lucknow bring even more attention to them?  Revolution 2020 advance orders running at 2.5 times that of 2States. Thank you so much! Won't let you down. 
My regards and respect for Team Anna. But they also need to learn more about sustaining a movement and build leadership skills.  Spent a lovely afternoon with at one of their schools. They are doing an amazing job. Do see   like wise..good to see u and great work on the 500 
Dear women, change. But only if you want to, for yourself. Never for another man. There's a guy out there who will love you for who you are.  Short Auto-expo interview clip:   RTIs! 
thanks!  same here Masaba! was great to meet u!  :) was nice..thanks 
happy birthday!  much humbler!  Am nice to people. They walk all over me. I kick ass and they behave very well. What's the lesson? 
thanks!  #ImSoMiddleClass in some ways and thank God for it.  Sometimes people mistake humility for weakness. 
Looks like the "phulka-making" article on Indian women had quite a reaction. Good or bad comments, thanks! Article:   It's Mercedes-Benz. Proud to be a part of mb.inspired and associate with one of the best car brands in the world.  Will be at Jaihind college, Churchgate, Mumbai today at 4pm for a panel discussion on youth,politics and more. Open to all. Come. 
Sorry for so many RTs. Contest closed. Btw watch me on ndtv 24.7 at 8 today on nidhi razdan's left right centre. Topic anna and politics.  It's Mercedes-Benz. Proud to be a part of mb.inspired and associate with one of the best car brands in the world.  collage or college? lol. i love the site. personal choice i guess. 
Thanks for huge response to #whatyoungindiawants contest. is processing entries. Will announce winner soon. Contest now closed!  I have always believed that one can be good as well as enjoy the good life. So yes, got my own three-pointed star now!  My team looking to hire. 0-2yr experience. Good with numbers. Mumbai based only pls. Email resume to michelle(at)chetanbhagat.com 
Hashtag #whatyoungindiawants and say what YOU think young india wants in ONE tweet. Do cc: too. best entry gets phone.  As an engineer, excited to be associated with cars again. That too with a company that values innovation and inspiration.  hey thank u so much for all ur support in jodhpur, and praise.. 
Contest: Hashtag #whatyoungindiawants and say what YOU think young india wants in one tweet. Do cc: too. best entry gets phone  good one!  hey. Nice pic :) 
The Y200 by Huawei is a cool android phone, with a 3.5in screen for just around 7.5K now. And am giving one out today in a contest.  Any guesses on which car brand I have tied up with? Signed books for a few winners.  :) thanks 
Huawei has launched a new Android Phone, the Ascend Y200. Details here:   In Delhi for the Auto-Expo 2012, to announce a tie-up with one of the best car makers in the world. Shall reveal more in a few hours.  hi thanks 
Would request Arvind Kejriwal and others fasting to end their fast. Their lives are precious. People will teach the govt a lesson in 2014.  happy birthday gul!  thanks. 
am going to now retweet the statement that will clarify everything about the power cuts.  Sachin's 100 and the Lokpal bill, almost there but not quite.  lol true! 
:)  people who keep switching their minds from negative to positive thoughts do better in life. now don't doubt this. believe it.  thanks so much pritish. Means a lot! 
Am sure the PM has power. Oh wait, he never did.  :) thanks for ur words..tc ok.  Good Morning! "Rahul Gandhi = Bahadur Shah Zafar?", my col in TOI today:  
600mn indians affected by power grid failure. Any word from the PM? Anything?  best of luck! hny 2012!  I do. Thanks! 
The Delhi launch is restricted. But twitterati can get passes by mailing hohoivaiphei[at]rupapublications[dot]com and making ur case!  good point..but at that age, all girls r confused!  GMorn! Anchored a fun travel show for Hong Kong Tourism, where I lived in for 11 years. Watch tonite on Zoom at 930pm.  
"What young India wants," my book of essays/columns releases on Aug 6 in Delhi.  why??  how? Can u also cc as he is webmaster 
Good Morning All! "The Ideal Indian wife," a tribute to Indian working women, my col in TOI today:   Anyway, before the flood of messages start - happy 2012! may the new year be filled with happiness and success for you all!  So Indiaplaza is doing this craziness. Revolution 2020 at Rs20.Thot will share link while it lasts:  
thanks!  The ending had to be what it had to be, but i must admit, everytime i think of gopal and what he suffered, i shudder.  30 days to go for Revolution 2020. No butterflies in the stomach yet. Maybe caterpillars. 
thank u!!  Gopal did what he did for respect and redemption. He sacrificed what was most dear to him, for the revolution. and he became, a good person.  that u r. But she is still in tihar. waiting 
Amazing trailer of "The Life of Pi." Can't wait for the film:   love u too! hny 2012!  500,000. Thank you for ur love, and allowing my thoughts into your life. All of you are the cool set. 
yes yes yes! Meant that. Just to make a point.  i did, thanks!  thanks 
it is of v little consequence as a news but is getting huge coverag3. That is all.  Gopal Mishra, Aarti Pradhan and Raghav Kashyap wish you a happy 2012. I know what happened to Gopal hurt you, but such is life.  Imagine urself facing failure. Visualize who will be by ur side. Those, and only those r the people who deserve ur love 
My prayers with the people of Assam. It is bizarre we are celebrating an inconsequential Presidential swearing-in when lakhs are homeless.  'Right cause, wrong time,' my col in TOI today, on why Anna in Mumbai didn't work:   :) thaaaaaaaanks 
And should we put the entire blame of the Assam riots on the Assam CM and torment him for the rest of his life with it?  The govt in the RS reminded me of the kid in the park who owns the bat and says 'i'm going home' when it is the other side's turn to bat.  I have never said any thing silly on twitter. #Iampawar 
These aren't Assam riots. These are Indian riots. We shouldn't be less concerned just because they are happening in another state.  Does anyone say 'aye' instead of 'yes' anywhere else in the world? But then again, changing that in parliament will require a movement.  Apparently a big politician declared his lifetime net worth as 12crore. Wow, gautam gambhir makes that in one IPL. 
oops sorry. thanks!  Watching Lokpal voting. History being made.  Saw a wonderful German film: 'the lives of others', about ex East Germany's secret service snooping on a writer. Fab. 
Whenever a molested woman is blamed for dressing a certain way or being out late, you let the molester off the hook. remember that.  Rahul G did come in finally, at 9pm!  Dear Rain Rain, It is September, go away. Whole city wants to play. We love you, but don't overstay - Mumbai 
Not me, my friend Sarah-Jane Dias ( ) was hit by a stone. I merely retweeted. I am ok. And even she is fine now. Thanks!  he came at 9pm. thanks for the abuses.  Short interview in rediff on Revolution 2020:  
Not cool RT A stone was thrown at me on stage in #Faridabad, hit and hurt my lip, for the first time, I'm truly ashamed..  Rahul G didn't attend parliament all day today, despite the Lokpal debates. Kuch kaam hoga.  Long day. Gave final ok for Revolution 2020 to print. Out of my hands now. It's like submitting your answer sheet. 
thanks!  Tracking developments on the Lokpal bill. Hope parliament will do the right thing soon.  see wikipedia  thanks 
"What Young India Wants," a compilation of my TOI columns plus some new essays, in book form, releases Aug 6 2012.   nice.thanks.  Just the belief someone strong is there to break your obstacles, helps you face them better. Ganesha is there. In you. 
Meanwhile, have talk in Jaipur this evening. Waiting since morning at airport to fly. Pl excuse. Am coming! Birla audi. 5pm.  A lot of negative emotions we feel are of no use. Letting go essentially means letting go of such emotions. hard to do.  Happy Birthday to Lord Ganesha - remover of obstacles and lord of beginnings. May he be there in all your endeavours. 
Since kingfisher's semi-demise, and resultant under capacity, every airline has become arrogant. Wonder if others hv noticed this too?  My teacher told me - praise and spiteful criticism mean nothing. intelligent criticism matters a little. but mostly, it is what u feel.  Eid Mubarak everyone. Wish I had been invited to one of the Eid feasts! 
wish what the authorities did bothered u as much as my typo. Anyway. Ur priorities.  Finished a one-week yoga retreat. Transformative. Lessons: have to learn to let go. focus on what's important.  The good thing is, takes two stars to handle my name. I could live with that ;) 
Dear govt officials, the day you start caring for normal people, and not just powerful people, india will b a better place.  Merry Christmas!  So, saw the start of the new Rascals promo. Mr David Dhawan, I also have a pen. Yaad rakhna ;)  
Apparent reason is defence radar calliberation. Surely could b planned. Every airline schedule gone haywire. Passengers, who cares?  Hi guys. Spent a lovely week in Koh Samui at a yoga retreat. For those asking. I am here:   If this is actually how some ppl in the govt think about tech, no wonder they can never figure out social networks.  
Chaos at various domestic airports as delhi airport announces sudden afternoon shutdown.Thousands suffering. Avoidable if announced earlier.  wow..thanks!  GM! see this video, by a senior indian govt officer - who explains cloud computing. priceless.  
congrats pritish! Lovely ad in the mirror. Out of town else wud hv been there!  hey thanks!  From what I understand, 30 kashmiri authors were invited for fest. Would hv been great to hear their voice.alas. 
thanks shashi! Yes of course. But u r way more than a writer!!  tell her to relax..all is ok now. thanks for reading!  Was looking forward to meeting my Kashmiri readers at Harud litfest,Srinagar. Heard fest is postponed due to voices against litfest. Sad. 
In 2012 India, a writer had over a 1,000,000 followers on twitter. And there is something cool about that. Thank you!  :)  Understanding women involves not answering every question. Most are rhetorical or they know the answer anyway. 
thanks!  happy birthday barkha!  make a mistake..sorry! 
Good morning all!!! 'How to turn the tide' my column in TOI today:   Hi all! so u guys know any lerds? TOI col today, "Save us from lerds",:   It is obviously a trick question. I chose not to answer it. 
Watching Cocktail tonight. For and well, pretty much that only. Yes, she is on twitter. Yes, I told you first and you owe me!  Good Morning All! my ToI column today, "Save us from lerds", coming from a nerd:  #lerds  40 days to Revolution 2020. Wife read it. Said 'how can you know girls so well. Even better than girls?' 
Inflation erodes people's savings. People have every right to demand a lo inflation economy. Whatever their consumption patterns are.  friendly? hello..easy easy..bye  If u don't respond to criticism, u r conceited. If u do, u r being defensive and unable to take it. Need a troll manual. 
If I am working hard and make money, and use it to have a better life, I lose the right to comment on inflation. Govt logic.  Sunday ToI column tomo. You can sense when some columns are going to..oh well, we'll see. Gnite!  Anna ends fast. Hopefully a good law. But spare a moment for all newsholics who will now suffer withdrawal symptoms. 
If you are having ice-cream, you cannot complain about fuel prices. A senior govt minister said that. Suffer Indians suffer. It is your fate  bad try..not funny..old one..do something original, for once.  :) don't have to prove anything to anyone! 
if bandwidth low consider a) outsourcing or b) open tatkal at diff times for diff railways- WR,CR etc. PS:dynamic tatkal pricing?  tch tch..dont hold ur breath..it's their show, not mine.  Good Morning All | 'The importance of confidence', my col in TOI today:  
Using the Internet and being Hindu doesn't make you an Internet Hindu. Just like Girl and Friend doesn't mean Girlfriend. Got it? Good.  hope not. so u get ur attention.  thank u 
Time calling PM underachiever? C'mon. Who else has achieved such a high position for so long by doing so little work?  Litfest Special: Me + pak writers m. hanif and mohsin hamid, tomo, Sun 18dec at 2:30pm and 9:30pm on Times now.  never said it did. do talk to ur parents like that..thx 
Am working on a compilation of all my columns and essays in book form. Will release in August. Not a novel.  :)  Good Morning All | 'The importance of confidence', my col in TOI today:  
Respect for religion should not come at the cost of lack of respect for the nation.  all the best to the team of Pappu Can't Dance Saala starring & releasing tomorrow!  pre-orders r on..comes out in oct. 
When you are dying, you will be thinking about the people you love. Not about the money you made or what you achieved. So, relax. It's ok.  :)  be positive girl! 
nice..  Another yoga retreat required. heading to Koh Samui, Thailand this Sunday to clear head.  hi deepak! 
Congress. BJP. Third to tenth front. I think we can all agree on one thing. Certain Indian women are smoking hot.  nice!  Good Morning Everyone! 
Sometimes I feel rather than the PM poll, I should have done a poll on who's hotter between Diana Penty and Ileana D'Cruz.  It is amazing how our scriptures captured the advanced concept of Maya thousands of years ago:   ok, glad u found clarity 
thanks. Pl note i merely analysed a survey.  Everyone is chasing something - money, fame, success. I don't feel like chasing anything. Or maybe i need something worthwhile to chase.  thank u! 
well the gap in nos was just smtg that got me..  Hi All, year about to end. Figuring out what to do next with my life. I keep having these 'what matters to me' moments.  i miss chowgule..wear the paw t-shirt many times! 
what to do? not enuf ppl doing that i guess.  my pleasure!  u won't be disappointed..r2020 is done! 
:) thanks for the interesting observations!  At the dirty pix success party, here's the dirty girls, two inspiring ladies behind the blockbuster. Congrats!   so u can write a whole book in 'no time'? 
thank u so much pritish!  thank u! 66 times!  send in urs..waiting for ur col. am sure will b amazing 
and for some worked up souls, dudes, I just did a column. I do one every two weeks. Chill. Life goes on.  Short clip of mine where I talk about that salman fans liked a lot:   On times now. 
thanks for all the support.  thank u!  Govt working last minute, under pressure. Reminds me of engg hostel. Do nothing in time but nightout before exams. 
awww...thank u! and it took this column for u to finally say that?  ******* a **** the ******* an **** as ********* so ********* for the ********. but ***** a *****? [govt approved tweet]  happy bday! 
clearly many ppl are passionate abt that one! when do i get the old monk?  I hate some of the stuff written on the Internet, but I'd hate it even more if they were not allowed to write it.  you think after watching TV, Kalmadi is telling Raja in Tihar, 'boss, you think we kinda overdid it?' 
I ran a fun, unbiased poll. I didn't control the results. Sorry if not to ur liking. Next time, read. And try reason, not personal attacks.  You can't censor the Internet. You shouldn't censor the Internet. That's it.  Looks like parliament is about to pass a resolution soon. Now would be a good time to hunt for the domino's brochures. 
Just that my col says "No, i am not implying this is India's verdict... it could be far from the national consensus":   really?   Do not challenge two 7-year olds to a pillow fight. 
Sad when educated people don't read my full column and start attacking and name-calling. see next two RTs.  thank u!  OK ppl, tried to do as many as I can. sorry if i missed urs. all new book related q&a is here:  
of course rajdeep. i am with you. In Facebook, you can only like!  Interview on UTV Bloomberg. More on I-banking days etc:   OK ppl, tried to do as many as I can. sorry if i missed urs. all new book related q&a is here:  
of course. I acknowledge the limitations. My title was 'the pm of facebook' that toi changed. But still. Rg at 4.6%?  Wow, realized had crossed 600,000! Thank you all for giving my thoughts some space in your minds. And congrats on your good taste!  yes i do 
Modi vs Rahul Gandhi on FB, my col in TOI today:   "Retail FDI and the bomb trick", my col in TOI today:   come to my launch 
Good Morning All! My TOI column today, on the results of the 'who should be india's PM' poll i did on facebook.   Good Morning All! "Shopping for Consensus", my col in TOI today, on retail FDI and more:   ppl making better choices. 
I want to thank all my fans. Wonderful things are happening to me because of you guys. Thank you!  thank u!  i have all details on my site 
'2 States' is abt bringing people together. It's already brought together 2 of Bollywood's biggest production houses!   ;)  i do take stands..just dont get time 
And finally, delighted to share the news on the '2 States' movie. And yes, we have a Krish! :   ya:)  i dont know. maybe scared. maybe dont understand issue 
And while govt is in making amends mode, can they withdraw the scary and stupid retrospective tax law that's making investors run. Thanks!  fantastic post on airports.  exactly mix of love and revolution 
Am ok with the new proposal for IIT entrance. Streamlines things and doesn't damage the selection process. Consensus, not arrogance, works.  Litfest schedule here (use that funny scroller to see). My session at 12noon tomo:   my memories of being an engineer! 
Govt bends on IIT entrance. Class XII marks won't get weightage, used in eligibility criteria. Kudos to all who helped. Raising voice works!  Times Litfest from tomo at Mehboob Studios, Bandra.Entry free, been advised ppl attending do a quick registration here:   if implemented well, can reduce it a lot 
It is cut-off season again. For those feeling down or even otherwise, here's a short story I did called 'The Cut-off':   The movie breaks so many new grounds, and opens the door for Indian biopics. Congrats to Milan Luthria (director) and Rajat Aroraa (writer)  it is his way of protest 
The crazy DU cutoffs, and the same drama every year, saddens me. Nobody does anything about it. Seat expansion, marking system, anyone care?  Few Indians make me proud of being Indian. Vidya Balan is one. She isn't just an actor, she is an artist. Superb performance.  a lil bit yes 
So, in PM poll on FB, around 3,000 votes: Modi (67%), Rahul G (7%), Niether (26%). FB polls r skewed affluent/educated ppl of course. Still.  Saw Dirty Picture. Fabulous.  govt will come up with its own bill 
Did a simple unbiased FB poll. Who should be PM? Only 2 options, rahul gandhi and N Modi. Modi winning almost 9:1.   No reason at all.  revolution 
200 days to the release Kai Po Che! (the movie based on 'the 3 mistakes of my life').  Why is Chetan Bhagat trending? What is with this guy?  good 
My col today, for those who've suffered at Indian airports! : 'India-Stupid and India-Smart'   If a dog keeps on barking your name, he makes you famous. The dog, however, remains a dog.  love story and corruption in the education sector 
Good Morning All! "India-stupid and India-smart," my column in TOI today.   Hate to admit it, but my haters help me with my marketing. Thank you.  10 min q & a, have some time. ask me any q's u may have 
Many people over the years have told me I am good at marketing. Just realized some didn't mean it as a compliment. Oh.  Ok guys. Finally, my #Love2HateU episode, now on youtube:   i love u too my dear 
3 rating agencies downgraded India's outlook. Rupee is at 57. These RSS agents I tell you.  session will discuss "If Pakistan is beating us at literature". Yeah right.  pls dont if u think they are bad..or refrain from talking negative stuff 
Media please stop debating now whether plan is good or bad. The IIT-govt issue is more an ego issue now. Where govt wont admit it was wrong.  My session  with Pak writers Mohsin Hamid, M. Hanif. Arnab Goswami to moderate. 2nd Dec, Fri, 12noon Mehboob Studios  thanks for following me anyway.. 
93% of IITD students believe the govt new proposal wud not have reduced stress. fail on key benefit. damage separate. More an ego issue now.  Mumbai ppl, don't miss the Times Literary Carnival this weekend at Mehboob Studios, Bandra. Amazing sessions. Site:   not even from the party? now shd i attack ur college too? 
Excellence, by definition is a little exclusive. Politicians,have to be inclusive. Politicians can't, and shouldn't run places of excellence  :)  i did..check facts before u talk 
I'v nothing to gain from supporting any side in IIT vs govt. Wud have supported the govt plan if it made sense.it doesn't. so can't.  yeah right. nice plot generator btw.  If #rahulgandhi is concerned about corruption, why doesn't he fire some corrupt congress MPs? waiting for what? lokpal? 
The government plan was bad. Period. It isn't easy to stand up to politicians who can destroy your career. My insti did. Proud of it.  :) thanks.  google my cols on cwg then talk. 
Abuse of unchecked power by politicians is rampant. Let us not let them use it to destroy our places of excellence.  hey thanks! and take care..gnight!  Someone should do the chamatkaar-balatkaar thing on Rahul G's made-to-order speech. "Hamari sarkar ne aapke saath.." 
Proud of my alma mater IIT-D for sticking to their own entrance exam and rejecting the poorly conceived govt plan that cud damage the insti  Thanks all for watching. Thank u & . More love, less hate. Good Night! #love2HateU  Rahul G being given the chance to score the winning shot in parliament. Fielders removed. Ab to kar do bhai. 
Allies should behave like allies, not nagging mother in laws.  Hey guys! thanks for all the #love2hateU comments. Congrats to and ! btw, my hater was !  If you hate change, your life won't change for the better. 
thanks so much sagarika!  On #love2HateU tonight at 9pm on star world, with  Let's face it, ppl r missing manish t's "allow me to respectfully explain...(10min monologue)..." on tv debates. 
Good Morning All, "Daddy's day in" with me and my boys full episode web link here:   Have a few haters.Fortunately, far more lovers.Went to Patna,here's a pic of ppl who showed up to listen. Thanks Patna!   If manish t came on big boss house, trp records shall be broken. And he can make his corruption free crores too. 
Happy Father's Day:   Tonight, I meet my hater. She was tough. On 's Love2HateU, tonight 9pm on Promo:  Manish Tiwari apologizes for his comment to anna. Yes he does. And sun will be rising in the north tomo. 
Thanks guys for the positive feedback on 'daddy's day in'! Rarely let my kids in front of the cameras. Repeats 9pm tonite on ndtv goodtimes.  :)  thanks guys! 
Hi All. I love being a dad. Watch me and my boys on 'daddy's day in,' a father's day special on ndtv good times at 11am today!  What an awesome crowd at Sharjah Book Fair. Had so much fun tonight! Thanks all.  Wonder what govt is thinking (if they are). Anna health will get worse, police will evict him? Yet another mistake? 
Power matters. Post doesn't.  :)  Sad to see Team Anna saying that govt backtracked from yesterday and showed arrogance. 
Power firmly lies with one family in India at the moment, bestowed by the people. Prez and pm are all their appointees. Those are the facts.  :)  8.15 pm meeting between govt and Anna's team. Hope and pray it goes well. 
Amazing how all newspapers gave screaming headlines on who is president. Did no one tell them it doesn't really matter?  :)  Nothing concrete from all party meeting. all they say: "due consideration" should be given to JanLokpal bill. Usual vague sarkari language. 
:)  :)  For those asking, pot belly is near dda office in shahpur jat. Food is fab. So is ambience. 
I am not a particularly big risk taker. I am just someone who regrets not trying more than trying and failing.  :)  My friends vivita and puja quit jobs to follow passion. A cool bihari joint. Pot belly, shahpur jat. Give my reference, 10percent off! 
happy bday!  At the wonderful Sharjah book fair. Meet me this evening 8pm at Conference Hall, Expo Centre Sharjah.  The cafe is called "the pot belly", at shahpur jat delhi. Always felt Bihari litti chokha in cool setting was a #win ! 
I question the whole idea of having a president. I don't find Mamta-di's histrionics productive for the nation. Yet, APJ is a good choice.  Kudos to & for a great start to #love2hateu. Next Sunday it is me on the show. Scary.  it will live up..just wait! 
At the UPA meeting, the PM and other Congress ministers wanted tea. The waiters assumed Mamta-di wants coffee.  yes..remember that ! was nice!  how so? :) 
those not being true to themselves, don't understand the purpose of literature.  i only give my opinion. like any other columnist. not the same as poking nose. at all. peace.  happy birthday!! 
Read a nice one today. The PM and President can be decided on a reality show. I have a name too. Indian Idle.  The Hindu also interviews me to ask the same:   It isn't anyone's bill. There are good bills and bad bills. If we get a good one, everyone wins. 
Director and 'Kai Po Che' crew finish 60 days of non-stop shoot in Gujarat for the 3mistakes adaptation. Well done guys!  "Why do CB's books sell?", the Hindu attempts an answer:   Arvind v confident they will get all the important points for an effective bill in. 
The beautiful wears a CB T-shirt. To get your own (T-shirt, not Sarah), click:    "Altitude sickness," my article in TOI, on Kingfisher:   So looks like govt will yield, modify bill, call it its own to save face but will be largely anna's team's bill. 
Hi guys, my team made T-shirts with fun quotes from my books. Limited quantity (100 pcs only). Ur thots? See here:   thank u!  Upon Arvind Kejriwal's invite. Came to ramlila, inspired by youth energy here!  
Instagram is making people look prettier than they actually are. Self-photo-shopping is legit now.  i didn't edit it! they did.. and they do all sorts of things!  Good Morning to my US readers! My new book:  
Government should eat humble pie and withdraw the new JEE proposal. Save face if they have to. But withdraw. For what is wrong is wrong.  thanks so much! and cheers!  :) 
Government's claim some IIT Directors are supporting the proposal hides the fact that the politicians control the directors. Typical.  i hope so too..i think they will!  thanks aditya! 
Great to see IIT Kanpur stand up against the absurd, brand damaging entrance exam proposal of the government. Hope other IITs follow.  Congrats for the baby girl!  :) love u..thanks 
wow! Congrats!  Happy to announce the Revolution 2020 movie deal with UTV. Tell who'd make a good Gopal, Aarti & Raghav!   thanks!! sent u msg 
Saw Shanghai. Fabulous and real. One of the best contemporary political drama films in recent times. Congrats to the team!  free loans = interest forgone = subsidy. duh!  thanks for ur blog! i think have to share the new site for now..but thanks so much. 
The CB fanpage on facebook reached a staggering 2,000,000 likes! Thank you. I like!   same for indigo, spicejet, jet, goair..  Thanks for the overwhelming response. Site slow, mainly due to heavy traffic, will ease. Try this:  
Look how pretty my BFF Asin looks in the new song from 'Bol Bachchan':   no, what matters is do u love me…more than the damsel in tihar?  Revolution 2020: Love. Corruption. Ambition | Chetan Bhagat's new novel |  
Hi guys. My new Merc blog: 'Dealing with Disappointment.'   they should not tax businesses out of business first place…covering one mistake with another i feel  My new book:  
Good Morning All! 'The murder of excellence', my column in TOI today, on the IITs.   R2020 highpoints: review in India Today (  ) & review in Outlook (   happy bday! 
PM says he'll step aside if proven guilty of graft. Thank you sir. We thought you will continue.  The reviews R2020 in India Today. Happy Janamashtmi. first darshan pics from iskcon chowpatty, mumbai. Blessings!  
Dear BJP, stop the infighting please. You are not in Big Boss house.  Not all praise, but an amazingly insightful review: :   Happy Janamashtmi! It is Krishna's birthday. May he bless you with his qualities - love, wisdom, fun and virtue. 
Dear BJP, stop the infighting please. You are not in Big Boss house.  am finding it!  will be great if u cud explain the bug to webmaster harish at info(at)dreamsmedia.in 
thanks!  they dont have it online. this for a mag that wants to reach young readers!  not bad mate! How did ya do it? And any suggestions for my web admin guy? 
well, one way or the other! thanks!  I like Kingfisher. Am their loyal customer. But it is a private company. Using public money/ subsidies for its own problems not cool.  :) dont worry abt the critics..do ur own thing 
900,000. Wow. That's a lot of people for someone who eats carbs. Thank you guys for allowing me in your thoughts!  our literati thinks so. am sure we r missing something.  Tomorrow. 11am IST. Announcement. 
Politics of symbolism has to stop. And we have to know the difference. Education system has NO easy fixes. Make new institutions!  am not asking for the govt to bail me out either.  New book announcement, and launch of new website on Janamashtmi Monday, August 22 at 11am. 
And coaching classes won't reduce. Double in fact. Class XII + Entrance Exam, coaching for both required!  then i guess we are not. :(  They keep citing the constitution.Do they notice the cover page has an emblem,below which it says "Truth shall prevail" 
In my class XII practicals, people who knew the teacher got full marks. Now that will count in IIT entrance.  Govt wants to save Kingfisher. Pl do. How can you make schools and hospitals when there are no cappuccinos in the lounges?  Yes,u can't hold parliament at ransom.But parliament can't hold people at ransom and make me accept a bad system either 
Including class XII marks in IIT selection will NOT reduce student stress. Creating more A-grade colleges will.  thanks!  happy bday bro 
Prof Sanghi, who has taught me at IITD, talks here about the JEE. This is what the IIT faculty actually think:   thanks  What is lost is people's faith in Parliament. That needs to be restored. Slamming Anna won't do it. 
It makes me extremely sad to see an institution that gave me so much being destroyed by politicians.  Hearing a lot about 's detailed review of Revolution 2020 in Outlook. Can't wait to grab a copy. Will post link when online!  Constitution & Parliament ultimately work on people's confidence. Like currency. If confidence fails, they r ineffective. 
Disastrous. The new IIT selection rules. Part of govt's 'Can't make new A-grade institutions. Let's destroy what we have policy.'  thanks!  Change the world. What else are you here for anyway? 
Some people need to take a bowl of rasam and drown in it.  Steaming hot idlis. Filter Coffee. Last Chennai meal. Shall miss. Taking off. Bye!  Acco to govt, Mark Zuckerberg is part of RSS, given his site used by Anna supporters. He even posted pics of Khaki shorts marked MZ. 
Delhi chutney.  :)  I know was supposed to release details of the new book on Aug 15. Got busy with current events. Will do so soon. 
It could make it a little easier to deal with if the Mumbai Indians renamed themselves Reliance Indians or something.  well. Many journos r giving them undue attention, assuming they r critics. Thot wud clarify. And cost of 3 tweets equals 0  So govt can: A) lie, blame the RSS, ISI, US Govt, make stupid statements or B) make a good Lokpal bill. Option A I guess. 
Sorry was in a bit of a shock. Rs 7.50/liter! Hyper inflation to follow.  happy to b that. And what does that make u?  Congress says US hand in Anna's movement to destabilize India. Funny. Coz the party prez is trusting the US to cure her. 
Petrol prices hiked by  Often journos ask questions like "but critics say..". Is it a genuine unbiased critic saying? Or is it a hater? Pl note the difference.  thanks nikhil! 
I think the President should be appointed from the state that wins the IPL.  Haters pose as critics to get credibility. But they ignore all, all the good work u do, and find a flaw to grind on. Stay away from them.  Guardian, UK asked me to do a special piece on the Anna movement. Here it is:  
happy bday!  Critics and haters r different. Critics see the good and the bad. Haters seek out only the bad. Critics deserve respect. Haters, nothing.  go on a hunger strike. ;) 
Mamta di. KKR. Ultimately Delhi has to bow to them.  have done huge events without him. 7000 came in kota. I am q secure. Hope u happy now.  Anna gets Ramlila Maidan. Anna:2 Govt: 0. Matchpoint. 
u did :)  thank u!  They'v stuck an earphone in my ear and whenever this lady speaks it hurts. 
For those asking for the link to yest col: Rescue the nation - The Times of India   5,000ppl at the launch. Haven't seen anything like this. Too overwhelmed by the response in chennai. Thank u! Thanks suriya!  Gosh. On ndtv debate. Hard to get a word in without screaming. I won't. I am tweeting 
Hmmm..RT The ROFL issue "Gulp Fiction: When Chetan Met Salman" by   Preparing a small tamil speech for tonight. May fail miserably but will try.  I wonder how lunchtime would be in Tihar. Raja Kalmadi filling their plates while they watch Anna fasting because of them. 
same here. Thanks!  Elaneer Payasam at the Raintree, connemara. Tender coconut pieces in condensed milk. Amazing.  The govt tried to stop the pressure cooker's whistle. Now the pressure cooker's exploded. Deal with it. 
Good morning all, 'Rescue the nation', my col in TOI today, on babus:   When you have amazing filter coffee in chennai, you wonder why all the coffee chains push soulless cappuccinos?  The govt, however, has to make the first move now, eat humble pie, make a better draft and apologize to the people. Do it. 
aww thanks!  My first public event in chennai, AFTER 2 states came out. Will be amazing tonight. I love this city.  While slamming UPA is fun (and they deserve it), best outcome would be both sides come back to discussions, with grace. 
Girls, if you ever want to be happily married, please start behaving like #futurewives and see men as #futurehusbands  Will be chaotic, but promise will sign everyone's books tonight. Landmark, city centre, chennai. 7pm. Suriya launches R2020. See ya.  Indians have suddenly woken up to an intense craving for what is good and honest. Current leaders gobsmacked. 
First she became my girlfriend. Then my present wife. At what point was she supposed to behave like my #futurewife?  In Chennai. You can smell the coconut oil in the air. In the hair I mean.  Now that Anna and several politicos are already there, why not hammer out a good Lokpal bill in Tihar? 
Sometimes my mrs doesn't behave like a present wife.  lol. Thanks!  Tired. More than anything, want peace, harmony and a good society. We will get there. One day we will. Good night! 
Dear friends, Kai Po Che, based on 3 Mistakes, releases 11th Jan 2013. Sankranti Weekend. We have a date!  Heading to Chennai, the land where many beautiful girls come from. R2020 launch tonite 7pm city center with suriya. Come!  Corruption hurt UPA. Arrogance will kill it. 
Kai Po Che! gets what Bond couldn't - NY Daily News   Many remembered. Am impressed. Happy birthday Gopal Mishra! #revolution2020  Mamta di can become a national political rock star overnight if she does the right thing now. 
Chief minister’s Sadbhavana on celluloid - Times Of India   oh, thanks!  Disaster move by govt. Disaster. Mamta di, are u sure u want to support this govt? 
In India 2012, cartoons caused outrage, scamsters roamed free, even sportspersons were corrupt and the government wrecked the economy. Amen!  11.11.11  24 hrs after PM unfurls flag to celebrate independence, anna is taken away by the police for no crime. 
In a jungle, easier to support the lions than fight them. That is why u will find so many so called intellectuals with govt.  nice!  anna first! 
All the anna-opposing intellectuals were talking about scam arrests and justifying that govt works on its own. Everyone is out now.  :)  Thanks for all your I-day and other good wishes. Means a lot. Good Night! 
The powerful can get away in India. It is a fact. People justifying his bail don't explain why the conviction takes forever?  thanks!  Anna meditating peacefully in front of Gandhiji's samadhi. Inspiring atmosphere. 15th aug after all 
A Raja gets bail. Yes, I know the law entitles him to. But we know that once out, trial and conviction could be dragged out for a long time.  but u do eh?  In Delhi. Heading to Raj Ghat to meet and pray with Anna's team. 
The simplest words can trigger the most complex thoughts.  :)  It is a great country. Let us make it greater. Happy Independence Day! 
Govt acting tough on black hole AI finally. May close int'l operations. They should.  Most haters I've met end up not hating me after they've met me. Sadly just don't have the time to meet all of them.  I like Tamilians. They are kind of hot. 
Industrial output fell 3.5% in March. Last year, it grew 9.4%. Anybody care? Not really:   sahi baat hai..  Thanks for the overwhelming response. "India on the streets", col in TOI :  
The crashing rupee bothers people little. A cartoon however, disrupts Lok Sabha. Don't we deserve an economic crisis?  thanks! Where?  Good Morning All. "India on the streets," my col in TOI today, for Anna:  
"Stop the Madness: A Plea for Grammar Laxity": Interesting article, which all grammar nazis should definitely read.   Trust me buddy, they can.."@nikhilsuman: surprising .. How can anyone hate you ?"  Rakhi tomorrow. Boys, if you want to leave town, your last chance. 
Sita quoting judge quite firm on asking a woman to move for her husband. Wonder if he'd also ask a man to move for his wife as strongly?  "My haters also read me", Deccan Chronicle interview:   If you don't strive, you are not alive. 
In Air India canteen, I wonder if they have separate counters and plates for ex-AI and ex-IA people? Else the next strike could be for that  jaan ke mere dost.  Ok got this as a forward. (For BlackBerry users) "After Osama, who does US want to get rid of?". Type USrid in BBM and press space. 
AI is prime example of what happens when you write blank cheques to a loss making company. 'I am AI, you are IA..la la LA la la'  Watching the telugu film "it's my love story". It's v cute...my first telegu film in a theatre!  whr r u? still at toi? 
Apparently there is a huge class system within AI, between ex-AI and ex-IA people. 'U do little plane, I do big plane. la la La la la..'  Revolution 2020, now on Kindle for international users. Click to read 4 chapters free:   Imagine you are watching a promo and notice this at 0:38. I am speechless:  
Why are the pilots striking? AI pilots are upset erstwhile IA pilots will also be trained on the new Dreamliner. Hadn't AI & IA merged?  Nenu ninnu premistunnanu Hyderabad! C ya soon!  Success is lonely, but still lovely. 
AI pilots on strike again. Why do we hear so much about the plight of pilots? Why not about, say, train drivers?  Heading to Hyderabad for premiere of "It's my love story" directed by M. Sreedhar. What fun. my book stars in poster:   good col. Btw I like this word: timelier ! 
More than anything, Indians love entertainment.  Never thought Thomas Friedman would read my columns, but nice to know he does. His col on India in the NYT:   Anna will need your support again next week. Hope people are ready. 
Good Morning All! 'Coming up: The great Indian jobs crisis', my col in TOI today:   thanks!  thank u mr joker! 
Celebrity RS nominations matter little. Prez election matters little. Still we waste time on such things while economy plummets.  So looking forward to meeting readers in Hyderabad (Nov 10) and Chennai (Nov 11) for R2020 launch. Event details in previous tweets.  Brought forward new book release. Will release Book V on Oct 8, 2011. Exactly 2 months to go. Details soon. Excited. 
The economy meanwhile, continues to get worse. A silly retrospective tax law on foreign investors is driving them away. Will cost us jobs.  Superstar Suriya launches Revolution2020 with me in Chennai. Friday, Nov 11, 7pm, Landmark, Citi Centre. See ya all.  hi pl email at anubha(at)chetanbhagat.com 
Anyway, what else is happening people? Do we have a new president yet? Media obsessing about it. Does it even matter?  Revolution 2020: Hyderabad launch. Thursday, Nov 10, 630pm, Landmark Somajiguda. C u all there!  thanks! 
i know. Lol  swami agnivesh on big boss? Seriously, is there any country as much fun as india?  hey thanks..may try standup someday! 
The official 'kai po che!' first poster:   "being rich, being good," my column in TOI today. this one means a lot to me:   Remember TOI review "Time to hang up, Mr Bhagat?", after my second book. I didn't. Now I write columns for them. Life.  
So the person playing Ishaan was AIEEE rank 7 once. No really. Will tell u tomo kaun hai.  Eid Mubarak to all!  Does it hurt when people criticize my books? Well, much less than before, but it still does. Imagine people calling your child ugly. 
Surreal to see book come to life. The temple, shops, cricket ground. It is all there. For real now.  read my tweets. Not nonsense media. Enuf said.  the short time window between finishing a book, and before it releases, is the only time when the book is truly yours. 
On the sets of 'kai po che', the 3mistakes adaptation, in vadnagar,gujarat. Hero gets gyaan from director:   see what bodyshop means. It is not flesh trade. Duh. Didn't realize u didn't even know what it means.  Sometimes, I cannot believe I wrote 5 books. I have no idea how it happened. 
"O Chetan!...Letter of despair, outrage..": Another one from my critics. Though this time it is kinda fun. Thank u! :   bas karo ji. I have the right to my opinions. Like u seem to have on me. Same same. Gn  Coming up with a brand new website, hopefully by Aug 15. It will have details of Book V. Thanks for your patience. 
Congrats Sachin on RS MP. My only suggestion consider taking your bat to parliament. You never know when you might need it.  that's sad. I did apologize. Sadly am not the only guy saying it. But they will live. Never doubted their hard work. Gnite  70 days. New Book. Calm before the storm. Have become quite reclusive lately. Still, have to pep up for the launches. 
After much thought, I have a special message for my haters. Do read:   thanks will do..  Can someone with expertise in roads explain why there r no potholes in HK/Singapore but in Mumbai? will RT. 
I hate elitism. Like Rajesh Khanna said "Pushpa, I haaate tears" before the chingari song. I hate it with that much emotion.  It is nice to question yourself from time to time. Makes u grow. Am happy the questions r coming. answers will too. Gnite ppl!  Bad Roads = Time delays, productivity loss, vehicle damage, excess fuel burnt, pollution, frustrating jams. Fix them, please. 
How I feel when people say I don't write well? Honestly? Well, like the owner of a packed restaurant, being told you don't know how to cook.  thanks!  Rain is such a old, pathetic excuse for bad roads. Why don't our houses dissolve in the rain? 
here's another one. i guess unless i write 'war and peace', i shall continue to suck:   At a strange point in my life where I don't know what makes me truly happy. Hope can focus within and find answers.  Like TOI for taking on the cause of Mumbai roads. Rain no excuse for bad roads. Rains heavily in Hong Kong, never saw a pothole. 
The amount of effort my haters put to bring me and my readers down is amazing. Must be recognized. Here's one:   thanks!  Hi all my col today on the BJP  
Great response to "What does #kaipoche mean" contest. Will close in a bit. Announce iPod nano/ books winners tomo.  that made me happy. Standing up for my work and my college...maybe u wudnt have. Good for u  Pray to God that the story reaches people as I intended to. Will share new book details soon. So excited. 
For those taking part in 'what does #kaipoche mean' contest, pl do hashtag #kaipoche as the team is tracking entries on that. thanks!  Most people in this world do not know what makes them happy.  Extraordinary feedback from a few test readers for new book. Relieved. Now really looking forward to the release in Oct. 
'What does #kaipoche mean' contest: 2 Ipod Nanos. 10 signed books. 50% prizes for non-Gujarati ppl (coz too easy for Gujaratis!).  thanks for the effort!  pl email anubha(at)chetanbhagat.com 
What does #kaipoche mean and when is it used? That's the contest. Hashtag #kaipoche in your answer. Win Ipod Nanos, signed books.  various reasons. Sms me. Will explain.  lol! 
So the name of the movie based on the 3 Mistakes of my life is "Kai Po Che".  someone's been waiting..:).  When you see the girls who rejected you in the past become fat and ugly with age, it is a lovely feeling. 
Coming up at 1pm. The 3mistakes movie name and contest. Keep a Gujarati friend handy.  I never thing of myself as an icon. I just do my thing - Audrey Hepburn  Kalmadi claiming memory loss. So when see his past front page headlines, does he go "oh my God, is that me?" 
At the Avengers premiere with my boys. Rarely seen them more excited.  Good Morning! This Sunday, enjoy the present moment. No future. No past. Just today.  Did you hear the latest joke about Kalmadi? Sorry I forgot. 
Happy Birthday Sachin! Keep scoring.  thank u!  yes, with new book! 
Some ppl take life and twitter way too seriously. Keep it fun.  Met some wonderful people at #litlive today. Was fun. Good Night all u nightbirds!  Don't make money. Make people happy. Money usually follows. 
For every 10 tv debate requests i get, i go to one. Guess if some intellectuals here have a problem pl do go instead of me!  good night!  "the BJP has a disaster in the making if it doesn't do something about the Karnataka situation" - Jan 2011.  
Follow director for updates on the 3Mistakes movie, who is braving the Ahmedabad heat at the shoot. He also made Rock On!!  thanks!  Yeddy creating pain for BJP. Sorry to say, but this one is a 'I told you so'. My column back in Jan 2011:  
Exclusive: Still from the 3 Mistakes movie. What say?   thanks!  Apparently JK Rowling has to apologize to our government for using the word half-blood prince. 
New DP. In honor of the new Ishaan that you shall soon see in the 3 Mistakes movie. All you ladies will go crazy over him, I promise.  thanks!  Thanks all who msged/called to check on me. Am fine. Else they'd be playing 'behti hawa sa tha woh" with my pic on tv now! Love to all. 
It's ok for TV channels to sell products that market superstitions. But hell will break loose if Dirty Picture is screened with 68 cuts.  thanks!  Seriously, you cannot have fractional nationality. Ethnicity yes, but you can't have half a citizenship. Silly issue, hope ppl move on soon 
You could replace the president with a stuffed toy and it would make no real difference to the nation. We may save some expenses though.  aww! say thanks to her!  I am at least 99% Indian. 
Given the never ending inflation, scams and new taxes, the national drink ought to be not tea, but the common man's blood.  thanks!  i agree. nonsensical issue. but so entertaining. 
thanks buddy!  thanks!  In any case, do you need a PhD genetics expert level credibility to make a comment on someone being mixed-race? 
It isn't a national holiday yet, but at least it is a sunday! Overwhelmed by your best wishes. I live for you. :*  thanks!  for those who are question Katrina's credibility, well she has achieved more than you ever will. 
yes, will call u..mayb coming week!  thank u!  The plane wheels are barely visible, dug deep into mud. Everyone's out now. Rattled but safe. Thanks all for ur concern 
thanks shashi! good advice..and thanks for all the relentless good work you are doing in kerela!  goodnight sonakshi! so jaao!  Can't take pics as military airport but quite something to step out on mud. 
thanks so much pritish! keep rocking in ur writing!  thanks for all ur support!  Landed in Kanpur on AI. Emergency landing as plane skidded off runway into wet mud. Lucky save. Evacuations on now. Thank u God. 
thank u!  thanks!  Landed in Kanpur on AI. Emergency landing as plane skidded off runway into wet mud. Lucky save. Evacuations on now. Thank u god. 
thanks!  On ndtv profit at 930. Interview with srinivas jain, show "the power of one"  call it 'we recommend', call it 'please buy this' but don't call it a bestseller, unless it is one. 
thanks!  I saw u too..  Sick of bookshops who fake bestseller lists to move their own stock. Misleads readers. For eg WH Smith at delhi airport 
However, tells me I can't share them just yet :( Will do so soon. All I can say is the boys look hot!  9 or 930?  Critics are the new status symbol. 
Director sends me pictures from the sets of 3Mistakes movie in Ahmedabad as a birthday gift! Ish, Omi, Govind come to life!  Heading to for #litlive . Panel discussion on "how can writers make corruption go beyond the mundane"  When people slam you for the slightest mistake, but ignore 100 good things you do, they don't like you. That's it. 
i agree! thank u mandira!  Rising prosperity means ability to buy more goods and services. Rising incomes with even higher inflation is falling prosperity.  Don't be bitter, make it better. 
thanks derek!!  Not an economist, but I think it doesn't take a Phd to know the difference between real prosperity and inflation.  Saw Zindagi Na Milegi Dobara. Gorgeous looking. Sensitive. Funny. Inspiring. Love Zoya Akhtar's direction style. Kudos and co 
Thanks! RT HAPPY B'DAY CB. maaf karo ji. Muft mein to itna hi milta hai..  Good Morning All! My TOI column today, this one for the ladies:  
& thanks for all of ur novels,newspapr columns,amazing tweets & ur noble work towards country  PM says inflation due to prosperity. So if I make more money but it buys less than before I am richer?  Rahul G says 99% terror strikes r prevented, right after terror strike. Way to go. Next time a plane crashes, say 'but 99% planes didn't'. 
thank u!  also known as, when arnab quizzed the quizmaster!  There's no game going on, no boxing match mumbai lost that there needs to be a spirit. Innocent people are being killed. That's it. 
thanks!  Bored? Wanna feel cultured? Why not spend the day today at held at See sched on litlive.in. All events free.  Is there a mumbai spirit? Or is it just desparate people who have no choice but to go back to work asap? 
thank u!  no my dear. i earned a seat, open to all, with my hard work. and i learnt a lot there. now chill.  Mixture of emotions. sadness for ppl affected. anger that it keeps happening. anxiety. need to stay calm. 
thank u!  My #litlive sessions tomo 5th nov, at 2.45pm (corruption) and 5.15pm (stretching language). Come. At See   Stay calm everyone. 
My views on AI, however, remain. The col:   no my dear. there wasn't such a contract or requirement. it was an education, not bondage.  If you have bad cards, shuffling them doesn't make them any better. #cabinet 
Invited me to meet him. Will do. Must say good to know there are some politicians who listen and are keen to change things. Ray of hope.  sorry: they choose the q's! love! me.  Negative people kill motivation. Be ruthless about keeping them out of your life. 
Had a long call with the minister. He shared his thots on making AI better, but reminded me of practical issues like unions/culture.  Ok. Live on HT Chat now. It's friday, so in case u want to waste an hour:   Waiting for and 's ZMND....kab tak gine, ham dhadkane, dil jaise dhadke dhadaknein do... 
In reaction to the TOI column, Civil Aviation minister Ajit Singh called me. Commendable of him to reach out.  If you are jobless, or just plain bored, live chat with me at 12noon (in 20min) on   remember this tweet.. 
Good Morning All!  Letting your dream die almost makes you a murderer.  100 days to new book. 
"Burning money in the sky," my col in TOI today, on AI :   really? Why?  :) cool 
"Taking a shot at your dreams," my new blog:   pl don't spam. Pl don't keep msging. Won't have any choice then.  Being a commoner and aspiring for bigger things in life #againstindianculture 
The more they cover up an issue, the more it explodes on social networks. Dear UPA, please learn these basics.  Negativity kills motivation. If you find yourself criticizing others a lot, stop. It harms you more than them.  awww sorry! 
Dear media, if u were ready to lynch the stupid porn watchers in parliament, do not hush this one. Be secular.  pl don't spam, pl don't abuse, pl be polite, pl don't expect personal replies. Pl don't threaten. Expect u will comply.  Every woman in my family, extended family,their extended family are into 'Bade Acche Lagte Hain'. Ok me too. 
Can't wait to watch some of the congress spokespersons defend this one. News going to be better than IPL tonight.  :) thanks!  'Bade Acche Lagte Hain' on Sony seems to be catching on. After a long time, a serial people are really getting into. 
Politicians watching porn clips is so last month. Now it is about being in them. Awesome.  Be excellent. At one or two things. Life will take care of you.  what 'thing'? 
thank u!  hi  3 Mistakes movie update:  
My birthday: april 22. Shakespeare: april 23. The difference a day can make.  Watching KBC, a contestant who teaches computers to rural kids for Rs6k/month. And he will win 5cr in next 20min!  shared new book details with select few. great response. feel relieved. looking forward to october now. 
When you reach a point internally where criticism doesn't matter, and niether does praise, is when you truly become free.  Good Morning! Happy November. Always reminds me of one of my fav songs. No prizes for guessing.   thanks! 
Netas screaming hoarse on US detention policies. Do they ever think about the daily detention they cause us when they block traffic?  thanks for buying original!  My Lokpal column, TOI today:  
Those who find faults in you, often can't find their own.  welcome!  good morning! "Love in the times of Lokpal," my col in TOI today.  
tch tch..gussa not good my dear. it's ok. hota hai. chalo tc.  Thomas Friedman, and other amazing writers. Pick any events u'd like to attend:  events on 5th Nov)  will let u know :) aug 15 
supposed to be funny? u know what. go back to your soft targets. accha naam hai tumhara. don't ruin it.  The wonderful #litlive happening in Mumbai this week at NCPA. Nov 3-6. All events entry free.   Some things, goals and people, are just not worth the effort. Cut loss and move on. 
is this supp to be funny? hmmm. aaj baat nahi ban rahi boss. ghar par sab thik. thanks!  thank u!  :) 
and what are u now, 7?  thank u  nothin like that! 
that's the best u cud come up with? tch tch. bollywood i guess. keep expectations low.  it's ok :)  so we have at least 400,000 cool people in this country..thanks for the new twitter milestone. can feel the love. 
not as much as u like me :)  Something where I am called a 'thought leader' and some other good and bad things:   dont worry about it..ignore them 
true that!  When Chetan Bhagat met Satan Bhagat. No, really it did happen:   :) nice 
If everybody likes you, you are kinda boring.  New York Times. Please, please learn to spell my name right. Bhagat. Not Baghat. For the 10th time.  On my deathbed, I'd find it easier to deal with the feeling of 'I failed', rather than 'I never tried.' 
Shall reveal name of the 3mistakes movie soon. Hint: it's a Gujarati name.  response to the responses to the NYT article by an NRI:   120 days to Diwali. Fingers crossed. 
:) thanks.  thank u!  hope u guys are having a good weekend. me working, working, working... 
Saw first look posters for the 3 mistakes movie. Wow! You shall be proud. But won't let me share 'em yet :(. soon i promise!  thanks!  To see what a terrible cook I am, watch me on Secret Kitchen at CNN-IBN today at 630pm (in a few min!). Repeat 730pm sunday. 
When ur not a filmstar or Cricketer, and people r still interested, u must be doing something really right or really wrong. Thanks for 800k!  thanks!  There's a lot of differences, but one must always try to work with consensus. 
Congrats to for making it to the Outlook cover. yeh hui na baat. Naam roshan kiya:   thanks for ur email sirasri!  With the inspiring Arvind Kejriwal, discussing the important Lokpal bill.  
had kept the navratri fast for a week like i always do. I write abt issues. Not pay homages.  thanks!  The new X-Men is superb! 
"Our fatal attraction to food," my col in TOI today:   This is a Telugu film poster. So what is this oversized book they r reading? :)   I use it all the time! No pvr tho that's why 
Happy Easter Sunday people! "Our fatal attraction to food," my col in TOI today:   thank u!  Anyway X-men time. 
For the record, a coup or anything like that would be a terrible thing for India. But that doesn't mean the current leaders r perfect.  thank u!  Why r ticketing staff at single screens more efficient than plex staff with their computers? 
Anyway, the whole coup story does seem a bit over the top and unlikely. But it must have given some scares to people at the top!  Did a 'proust questionnaire' for the Hindu. Revealing questions:   Pvr juhu. Understaffed counters. Selling tickets but main entrance closed. Total chaos. #fail 
When power abuse is rampant and anything goes, ultimately guns enter the equation.  never said that buddy...sajan re jhoot mat bolo...the best pm candidate? Why not me? :)  Saw Shaitan. Very well made, gripping thriller. Loved the background score. Gory. Don't watch with parents. Like. 
Pass a good anti corruption law, punish wrongdoers, be humble, win back trust of people. Else such risks remain.  thank u!  Came to see shaitan at globus. Got last two tix in first row. Rocking in week2. Congrats to makers. 
For all the fake bravado, nothing scares politicians more than the fear of an army coup.  Must read article on managing trolls. Need to read it like 3 times. Thanks / :   it's v good. Their silence is what's caused a lot of noise. 
So Housefull 2 releasing this friday. Well, the reason to watch it is this. Wish she did more hindi films:   "I do not hate anyone. Hate implies respect. I respect very few people" - lovely quote from  thank u. To each their own 
Yes, so this news of offer to make my acting debut is correct. However, will only do it if cast opposite top actress:   read my col..give yeddy a teddy..google it. 
congrats rahul! now that's breaking news!  is this an argument? Chill buddy. Joke hai. Joke. 
It's now about who leaked the letter. It is about what is in it. Why are people always more interested in personalities than the issues?  horses dunno. But if she gets bail and wants to watch it, u will go right? 
Firing the Army Chief will not change the reality and content of what he has said.  According to Digvijay Singh, the new Iphone4S app Siri Siri is an agent of the RSS. 
